ADDITION TO THE BULLETIN OF MEDICINE



Founded by GENRY E. ZYGYERISTOM



Editor: OVSEY TECHIN



No. 11



VOLUMEN MEDICINAE PARAMIRUM



THEOHRANS OF THE FOUNH GEOGENGEY, THE NAMEDOM PARALE



TRANSLATION WITH SIGN GERMAN LANGUAGE WITH PRINTER



KURTA LADEKER (KURT F. LEIDECKER), M.A., PH.D.



BALTIMOR JOHNSE PRESS HOPKINS 1 9 4 9



______________



P e r e in d with an g l il ysk kigo K I E V - 2 01 7



The G. The Z.



2 OUR ADVORITE



Tefrast Foam von Hohgingim, called Paracelsus, was born in 1493, probably in November, in Einsideon in the German-speaking part of Switzerland. His father was a doctor, and everything was quiet and peaceful in the house, as he wrote. But inside the son was blazing obsessed with the urge to study, to be commension, and to "propreachation," in the academic sense, his discovery and the ability to penetrate into the essence of such passion that he reached the summits to which his contemporaries could not rise with him and, who only four centuries later advanced in the proper points of view. The influence of his teaching was so great, and the rudeness of his manners, as well as his achievements, were as unheard of his time in the medical profession that he lived lonely, spiritually and literally. However, he was demanded by the sufferers everywhere. His healings were often such that impressive stories grew around him, which attributed to him the powers of divine guidance or diabolical magic.



The plume of its wanderings from the Swiss Mountains to the Pyrenees, the British Isles and the Baltic Sea, the Apennine and the Balkan countries, to Turkey and Alexandria on the African coast, are lost, covered as they have done, with spikes of hatred, contempt, distrust and persecution. What remains is a legend, and only a few facts, including the earnings of his hood doctor at Ferrara University in 1515, his participation in the wars of Venice in 1522, his practice in Strasbourg in 1526, the municipal medical post and the professorship in Basel for less than one year between 1527 and 1528, his brief practices in Colom, St.Augsburg, Krumova (Kromau), Presburg, Vienna, Villach, Klagenfurt and other places, and his death, poor, lonely and unmatched in Salzburg on 24 September 1541, in the city that gave him refuge for the second time, courtesy, which is hardly anyone else to demand.



What makes this man great as a thinker and physician is the anti-intellectualism of his worldview, his insecurities with which he destroyed the icons of the ancients, especially Galen, revered by his pretend colleagues, the energy with which he extolled the ethical vocation of the physician, the clarity with which he perceived the inexhaustible pattern, which God and the doctor weaveed all the veterinarians and the veterinary. He became the martyr of natural science, for he has taken away speculative speculation in favor of experience; a martyr of religion, for he built his theology without the church on the harmonious activities of God, nature, and man; the martyr of the improvement of life, for he sought the foundations of medical practice in love; and the martyr of spiritual life - did he not hold that science would eventually complete the creation and all the work of the great.



Such progress in thinking cannot be without suffering. From the doctor (doctorate) he paraphrased his name to Latin, as Paracelsus, which was interpreted as self-ininionatedness and vanity, whereas Bombastus (literally Baumast), was reprehensiblely taken us because of his candid nature and non-soft language. In addition, he was humble in the spirit, while completely extraordinary in manners. He was one of the first to use the German-language environment for his scientific writings.



Volumen Paramirum, translated here from the early New Topnower German language with Latin inclusion, is one of Paracelsus's first works. It is also one of the most important works in which the medical and ethical thinking of this great philosopher is clearly represented. The fact that in later works he has corrected his views to a certain extent does not in the slightest degree distract us from this early work, which draws our attention as introductory to his extensive concepts. The style, moreover, bright, clear and modern sometimes, cumbersome, is attracted and rooted in medieval times, highlighting the struggle of a new thinking boring inside it and persisting, ossified the opinions of his time, whose stereotyped mode of expression he tried to break with his mature coarseness. Having given the obedient ear to nature and to God, in whose presence he was humble as a physician, he became intolerant to every gaze, who refused to recognize the fundamental unity of all things and the proper humility of the physician before the great mystery surrounding all of us.



If language expresses a person, it is here. Cargo sentences are rumbling, rude, as well as his manners, not sparing words, as he did not spare a person. From life and professional relationships, he studied the ways of attack as a better self-defense. Given the real practice and theory of medicine in its days, compromise is ruled out if, as he had a certain idea, the truth beckoned. Undoubtedly, we cannot help but notice the child of our time in concepts such as alchemy and star influence. Still, even here it would be good to read without haste to recognize his thought, which is deeper than that of the cheap almanac literature. The concept of only the alchemist has



3 biological and metaphysical meanings, and astrology acquires a great pattern of physical and social forces. He carried out a monumental task in placing health and disease in a vast order, and pointing the cosmic forces on the action in the body and mind. Medical practice means for him the treatment of the patient on the basis of such an understanding. Blessing in the light of nature, he was the first of his contemporaries to apply the scientific method in medicine, without abandoning his humility in the face of a great remnant of incomprehensible.



No one before or after has had the more religious or ethical sense of being a doctor. He could afford to be bold and daring and simple: The breadth and depth of his diagnoses from a comprehensive point of view did not carry any risks. He coordinated with knowledge and relied on observation, while having complete faith in the actions of the whole for the good. He interpreted the doctor as a tool placed in bed for the patient's treatment, leaving a cure for God and nature. His practice required a holistic physician and a holistic patient, in a word, a holistic person who is cosmic, symbiotic, bodily, concomitively and spiritually united with the universe around him. A true doctor, in his opinion, knows not only herbs and decoctions, but he is also knowledgeable in the sciences and theology, and the practices of love and faith. Since one of the lonely geniuses of the period of the German Renaissance and the Reformation, he made it possible, in addition to his limit of knowledge of the time, and without receiving respect, modern achievements in medicine, destroying the traditions of the ancients and pointing to an even more fruitful future of medicine, in which man will be regarded as a single whole, that is, the essence in the wider environment than only his body.



The English translation was prepared from the publication Johannes Daniel Achelis 1 courtesy of Dr. Henry E. Sigerist. This edition was carefully compared to the publication of Karl Sudhoff in the first volume of his large textural edition of Paracelsus's works. 2 Ahelis published his text on the basis of the first 10-volume edition of the collection of works published by the publishing house Waldkirch, beginning in 1589, and collected by Johannes Huser. However, in his foreword, Achelis also notes the critical use of other text editions of the period. Zudgoff is not only approvingly expressed about the scientificity of Aheles, but also gives versions of the text of the latter in his annotations and reference critical material for Volumen Paramirum along with Huser and versions of the text of the Strasbourg edition. This is the last edition mentioned, the short history of which was given by Zudgoff, 4 appeared in 1575.



Volumen Paramirum, as it has reached us, is only a fragment written in the case of about 1520, as Zudhoff argues on the basis of his comprehensive acquaintance with Paracelsian literature. The fraternality of the work has already been commented on by Huser, who made various assumptions about the absence of five practice books, which we should assume on the basis of internal mentions, as well as the entire location of the surviving material. He promised to publish them after they became available. However, he was able to publish no more than two fragments belonging to Volumen Paramirum in its first part. The second fragment was known to Husseur by the manuscript of Paracelsus himself.



The annotations have been minimized, the versions of the text are marked only in so far as they become different in translation or present probable or significant alternatives.



KURT F. LEIDECKER



Mary Washington College University of Virginia



on 21 September 1948



1 1



Paracelsus Volumen Paramirum (Von Krankkeit und gesundem Leben). Eugen Diederichs, Jena 1928.



2 2



Theophrast von Hohenheim gen. The Paracelsus. Samtliche Werke. 1. Abt: Medizinische, naturwissenschaftliche und philosophische Schriften. (Munchen u. Berlin 1929), 1. Bd., pp. 3 163-239, 402-408. 3 Volumen Medicinae Paramirum de medica industria. 4 Sudhoff, pp. xlii. 5 Sudhoff, page 236-239.



4 CONTENTS



The Page



..................................... ................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................... 3



TEXT PARAMIRUM TEOFFASTA PARACELS .................................................................................................6



Book The First Introductory Obmarkings ................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................



Book of the Second Introductory Obmarkables . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .



Text of the Introductory Word concerning the Five Forces ................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................



Trekta with the Heavenly Power, as manifested over the Lower Bodies ...................................................................



Treatise Regarding ?Ens Veneni? ..................................................................................................................................................20



Treatise Regarding ?Ens Naturale ........................................................................................................................................27



Treatsis ?Ens Spirituale . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .



Treatise Regarding ?Ens Dei? .......................................................................................................................................................................................39



Conclusion of the Introduced Word of Theophart, Dedicated to the Five Entia ..43



5 TEXT PARAMIRUM THEFAST PARACELS



______________



BOOK OF THE FIRST CONCLUDED COMMENTS ABOUT THE PRACTICE OF MEDICINE



I I



THE ONE WON COMMENT OF THE ORGAN



Know that all diseases are cured by five different methods. Medical practice is with us, so it starts with therapy, not with etiology, since the therapeutic process leads to a cause.



The point of our disagreement is that there are five types of therapy. This is equivalent to our statement that there are five different types of medical practice, or five arts, or five methods, or five types of practitioners. Each of these five presents a method of medical practice corresponding to the cure of any disease. For, corresponding to the five paths, as indicated, refers to the establishment of five different methods of medical practice, in each of which the physician must prepare, attain competence, and become a great master, so that he can be able to cope with every case of disorder, ailment, and disease in both branches of medicine. below]. It is preferable to have one physician who has achieved competence in all five different methods. Now, in any method, you can wish to achieve competence, mastering, learning and become skillful for the purpose of practical application, you must strive to become knowledgeable in that method, beyond and above, the proper attitude and compassion for the patient. Look for yourself, not the patient, and show your own efforts, and do not allow the patient to do so who does not have knowledge. In addition, do not move from one method to another, do not show indecision just as someone who does not rely on the method at all, do not question your own method.



For, every method represents a theory, practice, and instrument sufficient in itself, and sufficient, in this way, as for the causes, as well as their healing. With this, we complete the introductory part to our preliminary description and approach to the practice of medicine.



II 2



THE INCLUSIVE NOTE OF THE SECOND



It was stated above that there were five types of medical practice, and that each method might be independent of the others; and that anyone could be a competent physician for all diseases in both branches of medicine. However, we did not say that five different therapies involve five different etiologies of all diseases. Perhaps we describe five different methods of healing, as each of them is applicable to all cases of disease, as will be described later.



First of all, if you want to become a practicing doctor, remember that there are two types: the doctor and the surgeon. Not because each cause has two sources, but because of the branching inherent in every reason. For, the fever and the plague have one source, but it is split. One part, in the form of a fever, passes into the rotting of the internal organs, and is an anxiety of the doctor. The other part passes into the plague, in other words; it goes to the center to become eliminated. In this example, you are aware of the reason for the discernment.



6 of the medical faculties. Every disease that goes from the center to the periphery is a matter of the doctor. But the one that moves from the periphery to the center is provided to the surgeon. It should also be remembered that everything that has a direction to the organs of deviation, as nature has ordered, is all medical. But everything that seeks the unnatural desire for the elimination is the subject for the surgeon. In addition, what is visible places of the disease are trauma; what is invisible is part of the body. Medical faculties can be established separately, in this regard.



However, more thorough study is to be given to medical schools. Since we classify practitioners, we distinguish between five schools. They provide medical treatment with five different methods. Five are also the number of reasons for the source of all diseases, but only one school can deal with sources. In other words, every school, or any school a person represents, must be familiar with five sources. There are five schools for healing; there is only one school about the understanding of the science of causes. This was sufficiently said about medical faculties.



III 3



THE AUTO OBSERVATION OF THE THIRD



Just as we identified five types of practicing physicians and found them corresponding to the five different schools depending on their method, so they differ from each other to a degree to which methods are identical to those of others. Each school is thus appropriate to treat five sources of all diseases, those five of each school should know individually as available for their treatment. First of all, you have to know all the names of five schools. In that case, when this preamble is over, we will continue the subject of medical science.



The first method or school is called natural healers (nature-healers) (Naturales). Its adherents are treated exclusively in accordance with the nature of the herbs, depending on how consonant they are. So what is cold correlates with what is warm, that which is humid with what is dry, complete to empty, the like, as does nature presents the supplore of all the opposite. From this scientific school were Avicenna, Galen, Razzes (Rasis) and their interpreters, men of this type.



The second school is called the Specialists (Speci), as they treat all diseases specific to form, as well as entities. Let us put an example: Magnet attracts iron, a thing that this does not does by the nature of its qualities, but by the inherent quality (virtue) of the specificity. In this manner, practitioners [of this kind] treat all diseases specific. Among them were the experimenters and those that you cynically call empiricists and all natural healers, when they use laxatives derived from specific means not strictly in the direction of natural methods. Followers of this sense fluctuate between different schools.



The third is those who believe that recognition (recognition) and the proper definition (designation) heal (Characterales). Since they heal all diseases by force (virtue) by force of their verbal images (characterization), as can be seen from their books and means (cures), they do it with the same efficiency as when you order someone to flee, and he runs. This is done through a word. Therefore, healing is carried out by a word that is verbal. The first to use this method was Albert the Great, astrologers, philosophers, and many others in this category.



The fourth is those who use entities (essences) (Spiritales), as they control entities (spirits concocted) captured and made the sick. Just as a judge puts a man in shackles, he is one of his physicians; for his fetters, and his key, he can open them at his own discretion. Similarly, staggered patients are liberated by essence (spiritit)



7 herbs, their essence (spirit) becomes decomposable or absorbed, as the book will be further valued. There are more schools of such perseverance than can be called, including Hippocratic and others.



The fifth is called the healers by faith (Fideles), as they heal the disease with faith, as he who believes in the truth and becomes healthy. This is what Christ and His apostles did.



In the future, five more detailed books on these schools will follow, as this is our intention to provide a complete understanding of them.



IV, Russia



THE DRINK WOMESTERN OF THE FOUR



According to our notification, what we were going to provide five detailed books about five schools, let us divide them into two parts: One physiological practice, and another traumatic practice, along with their canons and paragraphs. However, the preambles and forewords, which we separately referred to for both medical faculties, and they should not be superfluous either.



But before we start these five books for you, we would like to introduce you to the doctors of both faculties and all the schools with Parenthesis, which should be considered separately as the introductory part, called Parenthesis Medica, for your benefit. It must take the place between the forewords currently given and the five detailed books at the end. It should not be attached or included in any part, but must be entirely separate and independent. This Parenthesis shows you the origin of all the diseases from which they appear, what any school of doctors should know and comprehend. He has the right to assert this knowledge among the five schools, whatever he may be, and to use it on the basis of his understanding of the origin of the disease according to the interpretations of this Parenthesis. This Parenthesis leads to a discussion of the origin of all diseases and, therefore, appropriately precedes five detailed books, upon completion; why? Because any radical treatment must have a basis, which is the one who knows what the cure is based on. In this Parenthesis we must make five sections, and call them Treaties (Tracts). Since there are five things from which all diseases arise, there will be five Treaties, and each Treatise will be divided into chapters, in addition, in order to facilitate a better understanding of the principles of origin, all cases of ailments, diseases and the rest of this kind, on the same time as what they come from. All this, in which case, will be presented in two chapters, in accordance with our interpretation of the two medical faculties, and will follow through all schools, and divided by the rules. The end of these five Treatses marks the completion of Parenthesis, its chapters and rules; and only then will we proceed to the five final detailed books on sufficient reason to heal, as practiced in five schools.



8 BOOKS THE ONE-out weED COMMENTS



V, Minh



THE ONE WORLD OBSERVATION



Let us begin our foreword to Parenthesis, warning doctors and surgeons in the first place that when you read our Parenthesis, which marks the birth of a real physician, you do not assume that we have no knowledge of your books or are inexperienced, only because we do not follow in your footsteps. We abstain from such a class only because we do not prefer your manner of writing, your actions, and because you are wrong and inexperienced, as we will show in more detail later. The reason for our relationship is that there is so little evidence on your part and so many of the patient you are denying help that you would like to get rid of. And when you base your claims and refer to the written records of the Chaldeans, Arab and Greek doctors, it strikes us ironically. For their writings certify that they had a similar experience with their patients, which you have with their own, most of whom have died. It is not worth thinking for a moment that you can, by pointing to their scriptures, to denounce, to reproach us, for you have no reason to do so. Do not believe that they testify against us. On the contrary, they are for us; for we do not include little in our writings, that we refer to them and show them to be right. However, we only do this in the case of natural healers schools (Naturales), and what we say here, refers to the school of natural healers, which you, as tall and great scientists, are proud of yourself. In addition, you reject other schools, of which there are four, and do not even come to your mind that you do not understand them. Even though you find nothing in your books in support of what we support, it will be known to you that Hippocrates was more of a school that uses entities (Spiritales) than natural healers, though it does not speak literally. Galen was more a physician who believed in recognition (recognition) (Characteralis) than a natural healer (nature-healer); the same seems fair about others. Such skills and secrets can be called Magnolia Artis and in printed form will take you a lot of time for rereading and assimilation.



VI 6



THE INCLUSIVE NOTE OF THE SECOND



Now that we have told you about Parenthesis, which contains all the basic principles for a practicing physician, including Avicenna's basic theses, Razes, Averros, Hippocrates and Galen, you should understand clearly that this is addressed to both professors of doctors, those who are dealing with physiology and those who deal with the wounds. In addition, you should be sure that Parenthesis has a holistic theory and holistic practice that allows you to recognize all diseases and their medical cure.



A brief overview: Parenthesis has five Treaties and the subject of each Treatise is one power (eng) (Ens)1 . You should note that there are five forces (powers) (Entia) that form and generate all diseases. The five forces mark five origins (origins). This should be understood as follows that there are five natural origins, each causing all diseases, giving rise to them excessively, but many diseases are always there and will soon be in the world or still with us, or will appear in the future. You doctors should pay attention to these forces so that [so as not to fall into the error of faith] that all



1 1



In the future, we will basically retain the Latin Ens (stage: Entia) where appropriate, for this expression has a more meaningful meaning than the English "power], the meaning of which Paracelsus associates with the conception of being, given, the essence, the essence, the effective force, the influence, something spiritual, but still involved in the physical causation.



9 diseases are derived from one force, or are caused by one cause. It is more correct, there are five, that is, five forces that potentially cause all diseases. Take the following as an example: You acknowledge in your practice a disease called plague (pestilence). The question is where it comes from. You will answer me and tell me, from the violation of nature. Here you speak like natural healers (nature-healers). But the astronomer will declare that the course of the sky causes such a disease. Then the one that is true? My conclusion would be that both of them are right. From nature comes one [the shape of the plague], from the celestial bodies another comes, and others come from three additional sides. For, nature is the force, also the celestial body, the power. You know that there are five species of plague. We are not talking about the character of these types of plague, their nature, form or form, but of their origin, from which they are born, than they can be later. Therefore we say that our body is subject to five forces, and that every force has all diseases under itself and with them dominates our body. For there are five species of dropsy, five types of jaundice, five types of fever, five types of cancer; and the same with other diseases.



VII, VII,



THE DRINK OBSERVATION OF THE THIRD



The five forces (Entia), thus listed, should you, practitioners, know that they are recognized as strength. Power is the cause or thing that has the ability to control the body. But your position, in which your count is the one you defend against us that the whole sea (pestilence) arises from humors, or from what is in the body. You're wrong about that. Keep in mind what poisons the body and is not that the body is there in a poisoned state. Do not think, besides, that all diseases, or any of them, arise exclusively in the body. The body must be in a dangerous state, or something must be that makes it so. For the body itself does not provide a cause for any disease. In this respect, we present it as impaired that it has five things that decompose the body and have it to be sick, a condition that it cannot resist, but must be annoyance. They are the ones who rule over man in the body which they deduce according to their nature. Every force is thus so arranged that all diseases, without exception, are subject to it. There are, therefore, five lights that rule over the body, for the body must remain passive while a fire descends into it and causes sickness in it. Having a deal with a paralytic condition, the practitioner should consider what kind of fire, what kind of force caused paralysis. Since there are five of them, there are as many diseases based on five causes, that is, five origins. And the doctor who doesn't understand this is blind. For no force is responsible for the treatment intended for the other.



VIII



THE DRINK WOMESTERN OF THE FOUR



In pointing out these five forces, our next task is to understand them. Although the ancients, our predecessors, if they were born anew, would be surprised and alien to our medical science, which should be the least of our worries. Yet we do not want to reject their precepts, but we would like to extract their essence. To complete the book of introductory remarks and to convey to you an understanding of the forces that carry out control and fierce restraint over our body, allow us, in this case, to start with Parenthesis as follows.



The first parect of Parenthesis tells about how the celestial bodies are endowed with potency and nature that have control over our body in such a manner that it must remain.



10 To enter into passive and to accept all that the heavenly bodies do in us. This potential of celestial bodies is called Ens Astrale2, and this is the first force we are exposed to.



The second potential that controls us with an iron hand and brings the disease within us - Ens Veneni. In this regard, it should also be noted that if the celestial bodies do no harm to us and are good within us, then Ens Veneni must guide us, for we must be subject to it, must remain passive and unable to get rid of it.



The third is the force that falls ill and weakens our body, even though these two forces, just mentioned, remain benevolently and safely within us. It is called Ens Naturale. It is a force that forces our true body to fall into the disease by prayer because of its deviations and the schism of itself. Through it arises many other diseases and all diseases without exception, even though all other forces will be ludicourish.



The fourth force testifies to the powerful spirits that are sick and weaken and overpower our body. We must remain passive in relation to it, and allowing the diseases that this force imposes on us.



The fifth force that exposes our body to disease even though all others are supporting our well-being and health is Ens Dei. Be attentive to this power, so you will be able to recognize the nature of every disease.



By describing and explaining the different forces, you must remember that each of them covers all diseases above it, so that we get five species of mora (pestilence). In other words, everyone from Ens Astrale, from Ens Veneni, from Ens Naturale, by Ens Spirituale and by Ens Dei. All other diseases have a similar nature. Therefore, it is good to remember and think that diseases do not occur because of one single cause, but five, whereas so far you get along with only one force, and that is wrong, in fact.



The IX



THE INCLUSIVE COMMENT OF FIFTH



No one should be embarrassed about the preface to Parenthesis. For embarrassment comes from ignorance and lack of understanding. But if your surprise does not leave you, then carefully read Parenthesis, which will stop your amazement.



Your writing style, however, we will not approve, because in the end, you will attack us and look disapprovingly. You probably have reason to believe that you have all the recipes for fevers well described. But no matter how good they are in your hands, your craft is so unsuccessful that you yourself are stunned by it. If you look for a cause, you will find that you do not understand it yourself. You're looking out for something else that you should pay attention to. To the birth of a fever, you attribute neatly to 70 species, but you neglect the fact that there are five times 70. In addition, you direct your ingenuity to Ens Naturale, while you don't realize that there are four more.



If, as you say, Ens Naturale was responsible for the bed of the patient or fever, then you are partly on the right path. But you keep saying the same thing about it as if she was a plague, and thereby allow yourself to be knocked down. Let's remember for a minute, if it happens, and happened in the past that you had a cure for a patient suffering from fever, but the question is whether he recovered through your help or not. For if the feverish patient became suffering by celestial bodies, then he must follow them, and either he shall he or she shall die. Using your medical art on



2 2



Paracelsus writes differently Ens Astrorum, Ens Astri, Ens Astrale. Similar options are found in other Entias. The standard form was adopted in this translation to avoid confusion. It was best to avoid the various declenations of forms in Latin as well.



11 he, as you want, forcing him to take medicines, - all this will be in vain, like Tract, which concerns Ens Astrorum will demonstrate.



Make sure you are considering the forces so that you can know how things are, whether you will benefit the patient or harm him. The theory you're using is entirely tele-targeted, and only affects Ens Naturale. But you have such erroneous opinions about it that you are not able to understand what is among the forces of Ens Naturale, for you are confusing this and are unaware of where the treatment is to begin.



X X



THE INCLUSIVE NOTE SIXTH



Give us your ears if you wish. The control of our bodies is distributed among the five princes who must dominate us and call our body to disease. Ens Astrale, Ens Veneni, Ens Naturale, Ens Spirituale, and Ens Dei. This subject will be considered in five Tracts Parenthesis, as Ens Astrale must control the man in his body, get sick and kill him, along with all its strength. But before we begin Parenthesis, be warned that we intend to write as the pagans do, although we are born Christians. Which drives us, however, in this belief. It was worth us to write as Christians, the four Entia Astrale, Veneni, Naturale, and Spirituale should be omitted, and remain unrepresented. It's not in the Christian tradition, but in pagan. The last force we will complete is the Christian concept. Even the pagan concept that we describe in these four forces should not endanger faith. On the contrary, it must make our mental strength exacerbated. We call this a pagan conception, because it is alien to faith in Christ; and we acknowledge that you are all who learn and deal with the nature of these four forces, Christians by birth.



But what compels us to call the first four forces pagan, and the last power divine, will be explained to some extent in the same Tractata. However, in order to be impeccable in the correct foundations of the truth, we must say the final and comprehensive words of this last power in the book of faith, which we conclude, where we must apologize for the pagan concept and reaffirm faith as one of the believers who have no intention of advancing further into the pagan subject. We pray to you, Christians, to follow us and to accept the proper knowledge of our book, which is intended for such faith.



12 TEXT PARENTHESIS KASTE FILM FORCE



BOOK FIRST HAND THE PERSON WITH HIALL REACHING THE PERSONS AND THE FIRST LANGUAGE



TRACTAT KASTE SUSGENED FORCE AS A FROM THE LOVE LOVE BELN



CHAPTER FIRST



If we want to describe to you Ens Astrale, we must consider, most of all the first, nature, essence, appearance, shape and properties of celestial bodies. From this, in this case, it will become obvious how Ens Astrale is revealed. You accepted the celestial bodies as a principle from the teaching of astronomy, and then carried out an inappropriate indication. But you didn't think about it at all, if you didn't have a tendency to do so. Heaven, that is, the celestial body, you say, make our body, what it is, what is it is, which is not so. For man is immediately created as a body, and, moreover, nothing forms it, except Ens Seminis, without the help of any celestial body. You claim that celestial bodies control and endow, shape and do other things for the body according to their properties, which is more than a misguided (left-handed) 1 interpretation. For that's not true. This will be shown to you in Ens Seminis.



We will not challenge your opinion in these matters further, as it represents your own controversy in the results obtained by this.



But based on our Parenthesis, we give you the following explanation. Adam and Eve acquired their bodies through the creation and Ens Seminis until the disappearance of the world. Even if there were never there, and also, if there were no celestial body or planet now, children would still be born in the natural process of birth, prone and lousy, as they are in their several ways: one medical person, another Kabbalist; 2 one sincere, another treacherous; one godly nature, the other is vicious. Such characters of people are in Ens Proprietatis and are not received from celestial bodies, for they have nothing to do with the body. In other words, celestial bodies do not convey any inclination, color, shape, property, nature, or essence.



CHAPTER TWO



Our advice to every doctor to comprehend two forces in a man: Ens Seminis and Ens Virtutis. Although they won't be considered in detail here, it would be good for you not to forget to read about them in their right place. We give this advice, as the text that is started here is meant to deal with the Ens Astrale. Still, our intention is to guide you to how much Ens Astrale can hurt us. It is necessary to explain that from the outset you must know that the celestial bodies - which are the planets, the stars and the whole celestial firm - do not change anything in the body, nothing in your beauty, nothing in your appearance, nothing in your inherent qualities (virtues) and characteristic features. Get rid of the opinion you have long recognized and judged about man, and which is based on the nature of the stars, in application to humans. It's actually ridiculous. However, we must be sharply silenced here with our opponents, since this Parenthesis is not intended to give an answer to anyone, because we would like to have more paper and ink at our disposal than God allows us to use. Assuming now that you have realized that the celestial bodies do not give us, nor formalize us, nor form our characteristic features, you must carefully note how, nevertheless, they are de-



1 1



2 2



So Huzer; another reading: "Insane) . Huser has: "One melancholic, another choleric."



13 bark diseases and direct the body. Not that we are going to say that if we were Saturn's child, for example, our life would be long or short. Saturn's way is of no interest in his life, making it neither long nor shortening it. For if Saturn had never appeared in the sky or the heavenly firmament, such people would still be born; and although the Moon would never have been created, people with nature, in general, their relatives, will continue to bow without deed. Let's take as an example Mars, which, though cruel, did not have Nero as a child. Even though they would be endowed with the same, no one would have taken the characteristics of another. Look at Elena and Venus who are similar. Although Venus would never have been, Elena would still be a prostitute, and although Venus is older than Helena, remember that there were prostitutes before Helena.



CHAPTER THIRD



Although hints have been given, remember that there is much to be said about these things. But we'll have to discuss this at Ens Seminis and Ens Virtutis, dropping it here. Know, however, that the heavenly vault and celestial bodies were so well placed that man and sensual creations cannot be without them. They are not created by them. Let's take as an example: The seed thrown in the field gives a fruit in itself. It contains Ens Seminis inside. And yet, if there were no sun, it would not have grown. Do not assume that the sun, the celestial firm or something like them, creates a seed. But note that the heat of the Sun determines the time [spreading]. So, if you want to process something thoroughly and give it to the effectiveness, it must be done through a digestive agent. Recruitment works in no other way than through time. The thing that is in the process of digested, shows the effect of digestion on itself. This should be understood as follows. Recruitment is such that, for example, a child can not grow without digestion. For it grows in a digestive agent, that is, in the womb, and therefore the child does not need any star or planet. His mother is his planet and star. The seed must have a digestive agent that is contained in the humus. But humus is not a digestive agent without the Sun. The mother, on the contrary, is a digestive agent without any celestial bodies. And if the Sun had never shone, and Mercury would be regressive, the children would thrive and grow until their sun and the digestive agent was taken away from them.



For the heavenly bodies have no power at all to incline man to them, and they are not compelled to have any such power. In light of this, we will interpret the following examples. There are two soldiers, they are both quick-tempered, - which of them is responsible for the cherry of the other? Not one of them. A couple of twins who are similar to each other, who have something from the other that he looks like him? Not one of them. Why should we then call ourselves the children of Jupiter and the children of the moon, who are at the same time one in relation to the other, like twins? A child who is essentially like a seed is a twin, as well as a seed, not the child of the Sun, as it is said in De Geminis.



CHAPTER FOUR



Having said so much, give us your hearing for even more, for we wish to continue Parenthesis about the subject of Ens Astrale to evaluate our explanation of how the celestial body causes diseases and guides us. To date, you have perceived celestial bodies in terms of inducing the inclination within us, and this tendency has shaped us in their image. On the object of how to oppose the celestial bodies, you have published volumes, which are only a bizarre writer. We, the saying that a wise man is the master of the stars, means nothing as you interpret it. However, we will be happy to



3



We can't always be sure that references like this are designed to draw attention to the works of Paracelsus, which he published and lost, or intended to be published. Sometimes Latin can slip from under his pen, instead of a German phrase.



14 is in our own interpretation. The stars do not control anything in us, they do not form anything in us, they do not annoy anything, they do not incline anything; they are free in themselves and we are free. Remember that we cannot live without celestial bodies. For, cold and warmth and digesting agent of things we eat and used come from them. But not a man does. And yet, they benefit us, and we need them as sharply as we need cold and warmth, food and drink, and air. But in addition, they are not part of us, neither are we. But if they are like us or we are like them, or if you are not like them and they are not like us, why, then we must do all kinds of statements and draw them into disputes. Our creator wanted things in this way. Who knows what is in the heavens, the use of which for someone outside our horizons? For we have no use of the purity of the Sun, neither from the art of Mars, nor from the beautiful Venus. Only sunlight is suitable for us, as it is brought to the fruit and in the summer, where our products flourish. But to put an end to these remarks so that we can start Parenthesis for you, change it all in your mind. Suppose a child is born or conceived under planets and stars are favorable and most virtuous. Now, if, in his character, he shows completely opposite features and completely contrary to this, who is to blame? It's the fault of the blood comes from, as De Generatione points out. Therefore, knowing that the celestial body does not cause any effect, only the blood does. But the child should have exactly such features postulated for the hour of the planet's position, he [all] has it from blood. Often good and good, both the bad and the bad coincide, while only one thing is the cause and the other is not. The reason [in this case] is Ens Seminis.



CHAPTER FIVE



Before entering our judgment, we will apply to you what concerns the ability of the person. You had a good consideration and attached great importance to the assumption that man owes his good luck and the ability of the heavenly bodies, so that one man rises more than the other, one in the arts, the other in wealth, the third in power, and the like. Since you attribute it from the celestial bodies, we must refute it and interpret it as follows:



Success is explained by ability, and ability comes from skill. Therefore, depending on the skill of man, so he will be so skilled in relation to this thing. And if he is skilled in that particular subject, then he is successful. In order for you to comprehend this skill, let me tell you what it is like Archeus, as explained in De Archeo. We will not discuss this here further, so that we do not be distracted from our cause.



Again, you bring dissimilarity among people that, starting with Adam, during this period of time and among so many people, none was like the other, except for the twins, which is a miracle, and quite large. You attribute this to the celestial bodies and their wonderful move. It's inexplicable to us. We will tell you about this, but we have already written more about it in De Termino Vitae, as Ens Seminis was created by God as all the appearances, colors and manners of the people who carry the numbers must be exhausted, and how, when they are all exhausted, people will return, who will be like those who have passed away. When the day of judgment is near, all the colors and shapes of people must be exhausted. For this event is based solely on the fact that all the colors, forms, appearances and manners of men have been distributed, and no man can be born if he is like someone else. At that time, it will expire for the first world. In addition, do not trust the strange view, which assumes that the world has many periods and divides the world into different parts. When all the colors and manners of man were exhausted and not different appearances, but all coincide, then this period exhausts itself.



15 CHAPTER SIX



But why should it be of interest to us here? By the way, except that you can better understand our explanation of what we mean. You should understand by Ens Astrale the following. It's something we don't see, that sustains life in us and in everything that is alive and sensual. This comes from the heavenly bodies. The fire that burns must have a tree. Otherwise, there would be no fire. Thus, you will notice that fire is a vital thing, and yet it cannot exist without a tree. Now to use. Although this is a very rough illustration, you should accept it. The body is a tree, the life of fire inside it. Life gets its substance from the body. Therefore, the body must have something that protects it from the absorption of life, but, on the contrary, to continue to exist. It's the thing we're showing you in the guise of Ens. It comes from the heavens. You say, and it is fair, if there were no air, all things would have fallen to the earth, and all that life has in this world would have been suffocated and perished. In addition, remember that there is something else that supports the body, the same body that sustains life. That you can only be content with the air. The air is supported in this something and that is; it would be absent, and the air would disappear. The heavenly vault lives by this, and if it were not in the heavenly vault, the heavens would dispel. That's what we call M[YSTERIUM]. For there is nothing in the whole universe created above this, nothing higher, nothing more important to the physician to take into account. Watch now carefully: This M [YTERIUM], we speak, has no beginning in the vault, and it neither arises from it, nor does the heavenly vault send it to us, nothing like it. However, it is good to remember that this M [YSTERIUM] supports all creations, in heaven and on earth; and all elements live through it and in it. But as an explanation, listen to what was said in De Primo Creato and what we are going to clarify in this discussion about M[YSTERIUM].



CHAPTER SEVEN



We use, first of all, a comparison in the M[YSTERIUM" explanation. The room in which the air was contaminated with you and whose doors are closed receives the smell you gave her. This smell does not come from the room, it comes from you. So, please note: It is when you create this smell that you smell it that those who are in it should smell it; and perhaps for all those in the room you can be responsible for all their illnesses, as well as cure. In other words, the air that is in the room does not come from you, but the smell comes from you. You have to understand that we, by making such claims about the air, can also bring Ens Astrale home to ourselves. You argue that the air comes from the motion of the vault, an opinion that we do not share or recognize. Only the winds come from here, as shown in Meteorica.



The air comes from the highest good, and of all the things created was the first. Other things were subsequently created. The heavenly vault exists for air and all creations. On this basis, the air cannot come from the vault of heaven; for, as well as man, the heavenly vault maintains the air; and even though the whole vault would stop, the air would remain. But if the world perished at such a stop, it would be because the heavenly vault was without air, and the air disappeared. In this case, it would also be a sign that a person has reached his completion. All the elements would disappear, for they are all created in the air. In other words, M[YSTERIUM] MAGNUM. And we assure you that M[YSTERIUM] M[JSTERIUM] is such that all creations live through it and have their lives in it and through it. This M[YSTERIUM] M[AGNUM] can be poisoned and modified, and the person may be obliged to take it to itself. While his life is and lives within M[YSTERIUM] M[YSTERIUM], his body has no choice for so long, only must bear what is in M[YSTERIUM] M[AGNUM] poured out through it, and be contaminated by this, just as in the case of the above, where the air that was in the room was transformed. Podd--



In the 16 ways, there may be something that contaminates this M[YSTERIUM], it may remain with it, but it does not come from it.



CHAPTER ITS



So, Ens Astrorum must be understood as follows: Stars have their own nature and their various features, as well as people on earth. The same stars change from within, whether for the better or for the worse, to a sweeter or more sour, to greater sharpness or bitterness. So if they are favourable, there is no harm to them; but when they are ominous, their anger is awakened. Now, you need to know that they surround the whole world like an inshell of eggs. The air penetrates through the shell and first passes through it to the center of the world. The stars, which are poisonous, poison the air with their poison. Accordingly, wherever the poison penetrates, in the same place, the identical diseases will be detected in accordance with the nature of the star in question. Of course, all the air in the world is not poisoned by the star, but only part of it, depending on its strength. It is like the good qualities of the stars. Ens Astrale, thereby, shows the smell, evaporation, evaporation, etching of stars that are mixed with air, as demonstrated by Cursus Astrorum (the move of stars). It is in this manner that we get cold, warmth, dryness, humidity and the like, as indicated by their properties. It should not be forgotten that the celestial bodies do not cause inclinations in all things. However, through their evaporations, they contaminate M[YSTERIUM], by which we in turn are exposed to pollution and weakening. This nature is, thus, Ens Astrale, that it affects the body in such a manner, on trouble or happiness. Any person, thus, who by its nature is antagonistic of a certain evaporation, becomes ill. But the one whose nature is not incompatible with it, does not suffer any harm from him. He will also not be harmed who is so pure and well fortified against him that he will overcome the venom by the purified nature of his blood or a medical drug that resists the harmful evaporations of those upper beings. Notice the fact that all the things created are against man and man against them. All things can harm a person, while a person can not harm them in the slightest degree.



CHAPTER NINE



As for the subject of the discussion of M[YSTERIUM], an example could be given to explain how planet evaporation is harmful to us. The pond, in possession of its proper M[YSTERIUM], is replete with fish. If the cold, however, becomes too severe, the pond freezes and the fish will die, as M[YSTERIUM] is too cold for the nature of the water. This coldness does not occur with M[YSTERIUM], but from the celestial body that possesses this property and causes the same. Similarly, the heat of the Sun also works, so that the water becomes too warm and the fish die for the above reasons. Just as these two, warmth and cold are the two properties of some celestial bodies that cause such things to disappear, so are others that make M[YSTERIUM] so that they make M[YSTERIUM] soaky, sweet, sharp, arsenic (arsenic) and the like, for the structure of many hundreds of tastes, and so on. Such a large change in M[YSTERIUM] is equivalent to changes in the body. Carefully monitor the way that celestial bodies pollute M[YSTERIUM], forcing us to get sick and die, depending on the nature of their evaporations. No doctor should be surprised by this. For though there are many kinds of poison on the earth, there are as many more in the stars. Let every doctor know that no disease is caused without poison. For, poison is the source of all disease, and all diseases are caused by poison, whether there be any body or wound, nothing is excluded. If you understand, you will find that more than fifty diseases can be attributed to the arsenic, more than fifty, since no one is identical to the other, and yet all come from arsenic. Many more are due to salts, even more mercury, more realgar and sulfur. We show you this, so you will remember and know that you are doing your efforts to waste



17 recognition of the individual origin of each disease, as one thing will burn to produce a lot of diseases. If you rush in this direction, you will find the cause of the others. So, adhere to the rule to determine where the disease comes from is not the cause of its development. Practice will give you that.



CHAPTER TYMBER



However, in order to convey to you a better understanding of what we want you to know that we, for example, do not blame only the summer and winter regarding the placement of our body in an unfavorable condition. But we blame each individual planet and star when it is dominant, because it permeates M[YSTERIUM] and maintains it acceptable for its dominant influence. So, some tend to overoquire M[YSTERIUM], some produce too much arsenic, others impregnate gray, others impregnate the mercury. For, in relation to bodily health, their dominant influences are either poison for us or the source of health, except when, because of the distance, this evaporation cannot permeate us. Explore the following example in this regard. Suppose that the arsenic stars in their dominant influences affect the center and the surface of the earth; you should note that when they come into contact with water, they poison all the water with their arsenic. When all the water is poisoned, the fish feel it and leave their refuge for the sake of other places. Therefore, they rise from below to the surface, believing that they will find a non-oxidized and uncontaminated life. The result is that you will find in the cities of different countries a large number of fish that were collected there.



So note that when so many fish you haven't heard of for many years have been caught, many deaths occur in the same area. For, the arsenic who causes fish that have never gone out of the depths for many years to come to the surface also poisons people who get sick after eating fish. For man is so much greater that he will not feel it as easily as the fish do. Not only fish and people, but also the fruits of the fields and everything that lives are poisoned by other species of poison contained in M[YSTERIUM] and expiring by stars, as manifested from Virtutes Stellarum (the potency of stars).



CHAPTER THE ONE



Now let's think about what we've just said. In this respect, in addition, our body is like a lake and its members are like fish. If the life that is in the body and in all its members is poisoned by the stars, then, moreover, the internal organs that absorb the poison become sick. Note, in this case, that some Entia Astralia have such a poisonous nature that they will harm only blood, as the realm of the stars. Some will harm only the head, as the mercury stars do; some, like salts, are only bones and vessels. A number are so arranged that they cause dropsy and tumors as sulfur arsenic (orpiment), 4 others, in addition, fevers like bitter stars.



For further your proper understanding, we will show you how things and Ens are classified. For the first time, some go into common diseases (systemic diseases). They are the ones that relate to life solutions (vital liquors); they produce common diseases. Others produce wounds, and they relate to the ability to displace. All the theories contain these two.



4 4



The Strasbourg edition has Opperment, Huser opperimena. Zudgoff interprets: auripigmentum.



18 PARAGRAF THE FIRST



With regard to our explanation as Ens Astrale causes disease in our body, as well as wounds, it is necessary to know that how much the disease affects, which leaves a person, as well as the diseases that leave a person, we will not discuss in this place how the poison resides in every star. This is more about astronomy than medicine.



In any case, there are five poisons. They cause a dropsy that has only one picture of the disease, but five different characteristics. Thus one is a poison belonging to the celestial bodies, the other four belonging to the other forces; and yet they all produce dropsy, as are the five kinds of sulfur, and so on.



PARAGRAF THE SECOND



But how it will be recognized, how the dropsy arises and from which Ens and what medicine it is treated, it was indicated in De Morborum Medicationibus. At the end, we caution not to treat the astral disease, when the star in question is in the dominant influence, for it has more power than the doctor. In all this it should not be forgotten that if you were a good doctor, then you would have kept the time, and the healing process of a certain disease should not rush before its time, since this is not in the nature of things.



5



These two fragments mentioned in the Foreword refer to the first Book, respectively, but they are mostly repetitive.



19 ABOUT PARENTHESIS AND CLEANERS, RELATED WITH LANGUAGE ISSUES, BOOK VEHICLE



TRACTAT CASECYNO "ENS VENENI"



CHAPTER FIRST



Explaining above Ens Astrale, we must now explain Ens Veneni, which is the second most powerful thing that causes our body disease. Let us out here the same thesis we have made for Ens Astrale, that our body is coerced and prompted by five forces. But in order for you to better understand and consider our arguments, we will allow us to put the discussion of these forces on the forewords and proceed to explain the thesis of Ens Veneni as follows.



You know that the human body must have a power that is the driving force that is the driving force that sustains and feeds; and where there is insufficient food, there is no life there. So listen to what he who created and created our body created, and created, and created, and he created food with the body, but not so perfect. Understand that the body was given to us without poison, and there is no poison in it. But in that we have to offer the body as food, there is poison in that. In other words, the body was created perfect, but not otherwise. Whereas the other, animals and fruits, food for us, can also be a poison for us. However, as for them, they are not poison or food. They are creatures as perfect as we are. And yet, when they become food for us, they form poison for us. What is not a poison for ourselves is, however, a poison for us.



CHAPTER TWO



In addition, it should be understood that everything is perfect within itself and well done in all its parts. But if used as a part, it is either useful or harmful. Let's take a bull that eats the grass: he eats its own poison, and also consumes healthy food. For the grass contains poison and healthy material, food, and medicine. But the grass itself is not a poison. The food and drink that a person accepts is either a poison or a food for him. But, in addition, understand what he eats is not his own poison.



In what we explain so much, know that we touch two different objects: one of them concerns man (excluding the nature of animals and other growing things), the other concerns his consumption. To facilitate understanding, note that one thing that is in man is a great world of nature; the other is a poison pervading nature. In order to show you everything in Parenthesis, we encourage you to draw your attention to the fact that God created all things perfect in themselves, but imperfect, if they serve each other. This is the subject of discussion of our second Ens, which is Veneni. However, you also need to know that we do not support what God has defined an alchemist only to follow man or creation in their own functions. But he defined an alchemist for us in order to transform the imperfect, which we must dispose of into something useful to us so that we, if possible, do not consume the poison that we receive from things that are useful as poison, but removing it from the useful.



The fact that we're going to touch on you about this alchemist, note it well.



CHAPTER THIRD



Since every thing itself is perfect, but in relation to some other thing is either poison or useful, our reasoning compels us to believe that God has defined the alchemist for whom he uses the other as a part, and which enters it, or is sent to him as a poison or something beneficial. Such a great master is



20 he divides these two, poison in his proper bag, a useful substance in the body. In this order, you should understand and accept our thesis.



Remembering this, consider a comparison of a different character. He who is a lord or ruler is perfect, because he himself is self-employed, as befits the lord. But he was not a ruler, he had no servants, who made him who he was, ruler. Now, note that the servants as individuals are perfect; but not in the matter of the ruler. They are good and bad in relation to it. However, to understand the alchemist of nature, note that God has given the ruler insight, as it is, appropriate for the ruler. She teaches him to deflect the bad servants and to accept the good of them. If you have difficulty understanding such a comparison, then you will reveal the meaning by studying the teaching of the sage, in which these things are explained. Therefore strengthen it in memory: Man must eat and drink, for the body that harbours his life requires and cannot live without it. Thus, a person is forced to take his own poison, sickness and death, through food and drink. In that case, it could be interpreted as an argument against the One who gave us our body and food, and all this in order to kill us with it. And yet you must know that He takes away life not as beings, but allows every being to remain perfect within himself. Even though the being may be a poison for another being, which is also not a reproach or accusation of Him.



CHAPTER FOUR



Understand the Creator in this way: All things are perfect in yourself, and so it was established by the Creator that one must support the other, the grass of the cow, the cow. Thus, the perfection of one thing, which is good and evil and imperfection in relation to another, which consumes it, has led Him to create something else (something on top of creation). How's that? For he has brought into the thing which the other being must use, the quality, the ability, and the skill, is that by this poison becomes sifted from the useful, without harm from the body and food. That's how it works.



Let's take as an example the following: Peacock eats snakes, lizards and stellions*. These animals are perfect in themselves and healthy, and yet when in demand by other animals, they occupy the category of poison, excluding the peacock. But as to the reason for this, you must know that the alchemist of the Peacock is so skillful in such a separation of poison from the useful in things that do not harm the Peacock, that no animal is equal to how much their alchemist has to do. Remember that each animal has its own food, which is intended to be food, especially adapted to it and has an alchemist specially designed for this, for the performance of the department.



Strauss is entrusted with an alchemist who separates iron, that is, excrement from food, a thing impossible for any other animal. The fire is intended as food for the salamander, that is, Corpus Ignis. For this purpose, she has an alchemist of her own.



For pigs, the excrement is appropriate. Although they are a poison (eliminating for this reason the alchemist of nature from man), they, nevertheless, serve pigs as food, since the alchemist of the pig is still more skillful than the alchemist of man, extracting food even from the excrement that the human alchemist is not able to do. Therefore, pig excrement is not eaten by any other animals at all. For there is no more perceptive than the alchemist who will analyze the food more thoroughly than the pigthean. The same is true in other cases, which we omit for the benefit of brevity, as you know them well enough.



*



The lizard (Stellio vulgaris), olive-green with small star spots, is common in the eastern Mediterranean among the ruins. (Rep. The G. Z.)



21 CHAPTER FIFTH



Having told you so about the alchemist, remember that the alchemist was determined by the Creator solely for the purpose of extracting what does not belong to the useful, in favor of the one who takes it in his body as food, as the Creator has predestined it. Remember, besides what was said at the beginning, that was said. f.e., that there are five things that govern a person and a person is subject to how the Ens Astrale that has been explained, and Ens Veneni, which is next in line.



Now, let a man be cheerful and healthy under all the stars, but he still has no guarantee for Ens Veneni, we only have to wait and see what she will bring him under her influence. Let it be, in this case, as we left it in entry. For a comprehensive and easy understanding of these issues, attention must be drawn to the very beginning, where we must show either how poison may or can not cause any harm. There is no doubt that we have an alchemist within ourselves, who has been defined and given to us by the Creator and extracts poison from the useful so that we do not receive any damage from this. And yet we must also talk about how we get damage from the fact that all illnesses in a person come from Ens Veneni, as well as others, leaving at the moment what does not cause us any harm, but useful. That, however, later.



CHAPTER SIX



It is well aware that astronomers are also mistaken in that they point to our bodily infirmities and thereby predict a happy and healthy body. If the latter does not take place, it is only because other forces (of which there are four) cause the suffering of the body, not the stars. Therefore, we must grin and laugh at their writings when they give us certain guarantees of health and leave without consideration that there are four more forces that are as strong as the stars. But we have to laugh at them. What would a cat be without a mouse, or a prince without a fool? Physiomanticus is as inventing stories as it may be, causing us to cry. He will provide health assurance, and he does not realize that there are four forces that he does not understand. For he speaks on the basis of Ens Naturale and lets go of something in silence that he is carrying us a little. It will be necessary for a man who is well savowed in knowledge, who could foresee what will happen from the course. For there are five directions and only one person. He who neglects the direction and acts on the basis of another [direction] may well be counted among the sad prophet. To systematize and provide our opinions on the basis of analysis, in order to indicate what he has revealed, along with the reason why, it causes great praise from us, and we exalt man for it. If, therefore, Entist Pyromanticus judges everything through the spirit, Entister Physionomus relies on human nature itself, Entistist Theologicus on God's order and Entistor Astronomus on the stars, then each of them deceives himself. But they would be all right if all five of them were united. So, let's tell you, don't foretell me if you don't know the power of [Entiia] five Entia. Only then will we stop ridiculing you.



CHAPTER SEVEN



In order to show you why and why the alchemist, understand our statement that God has established for every creation his own existence and what belongs to him. We are not talking about the ability of creation to control ourselves or the like, but about the use of what it needs, and we have to have what, in particular, contains poison. The creation has an agent within its body that eliminates this poison from what the body absorbs. He is called alchemist because he uses the art of alchemy. It separates the harmful from the useful, changes the useful in the tincture, strengthens the body so that it will live, adapts the subject to nature, leads to a proper state of nature so that it becomes flesh and blood. This al-



22 The chemist resides in the stomach, which is his instrument where he boils and works. Let's illustrate:



The person who eats meat, which contains poison and food, considers everything useful when he eats. For the poison is hidden among the useful, and there is nothing useful among the poison. When, in this way, food, namely meat, reaches the stomach, the alchemist is ready and eliminates what is not contributing to the well-being of the body. This alchemist moves to a special place, and useful to which it belongs. This is the way the Creator has ordained. In such a manner, the body makes sure that no harm happens to him from the poison it takes with food, poison, being eliminated from the body by an alchemist without the help of man. Such a nature is thus the inherent quality (virtue) and the power of the alchemist in man.



CHAPTER ITS



And once again, it should be noted that in every thing a person must take, there is poison hidden among what is useful, namely: Essentia and Vennum in everything. Essentia is what supports a person, Venenum, is what makes him sick. The latter is contained in any food product and acts against an animal that uses it, without anything except.



You doctors note, in particular, that since the body exists through food, must have it, and fall under its influence, it must eat food such as it, which is under two aspects, useful and harmful, not completely divided, and let the alchemist analyze it.



Consider now carefully: If the alchemist is not at work and the poison is not completely eliminated from the useful according to the rules of art, then a combination of venom ingredients and useful, and subsequently, a food product arises there as a result of rotting. This is what shows us a human disease. For all the diseases that a person can have from Ens Veneni are born of the rotting of the food of the digestive product. Digestion should be regulated by alchemistry not in the preference of either party. But if digestion is imperfect, then the alchemist does not use his tool in complete suffice. Decomposition is a consequence. It is the mother of all diseases. As such, it should be fully captured on you by doctors in favor of your extensive excuses. For, depending on its current state and current, the decomposition will poison the body.



For example, water that is clean and light can be painted with any color as you wish. The body is like water, and decomposition is a dyeing substance. No, in fact, no color, except the one that is based on the poison and is an indication and symbol of its poison.



CHAPTER NINE



In order to present an object for a better understanding, we ask you to learn what decomposition occurs in two ways, locally and through certain arrogation passes, as follows below.



Suppose decomposition began at digestion, and the alchemist is mistaken in his analysis because of the inability of the digestive agent to eliminate, there is, thus, in the place of the gener-induced rot, which is poisonous. For every rotting poisons the place in which it occurs, and is the foci of a certain deadly poison. For rotting is the destruction of what is useful. If the useful is not able to function, the poison over the useful has a superiority and cannot be recognized, except in the form of a useful, defiled by rotting. In this case, it becomes a hearth for those diseases that fall under its influence.



But, any search for the passages of the deducement is due to the diversity of nature in the method of breeding. So, when the poison is removed, the alchemist removes each poison bypass, proper for this: White sulfur through the nose, an arsenic through the ear, excrement through the anus, and similar to all other poisons, for everyone according to how its passage was arranged. If one of these poisons is block-



23 van either by the natural impossibility, the conditions characteristic of this, or the like, then it also becomes a focus of the disease if you are affected.



Therefore, there are two common sources for all diseases that we will not discuss with you in this place. But you'll find them in all the details in the books De Origine Morborum.



CHAPTER TYPE



Explaining the alchemy of nature, since it is part of every animal, as well as the need for removal, which should take place in the stomach, I give you a brief summary of how all diseases are found to occur, as indicated. For a man, in order to be healthy and considered with good strength, he must have, for example, a good alchemist who makes a good analysis with good tools, vessels, and passages of removal. There is, much more to good tools. For, of course, the celestial bodies are well situated together with all other powers. Suppose that we were not concerned about all this and assumed that the forces are well positioned and strong, there are, however, many cases (accidents) that can occur with the body that spoil, destroy, defile and pollute tools, vessels, and passages of removal, and possibly rupture and clog them.



For fire is antagonistic of nature and body. It, because of its peculiarity, nature, heat, dryness and qualities, causes damage, up to the change of the tools of the alchemist, who establishes a certain method, and which makes it insufficient for the result. Likewise, water is antagonistic to the body and vessels by virtue of its nature, composition and specificity. This can be so pronounced that the tools become clogged with water, converted and modified. Similarly, with regard to air and all the necessary things. In this manner, other external cases, all of which are strong enough to break, deflate and destroy vessels, tools and removal passes. In this case, the alchemist is dead and powerless. He may not fulfill his task quantitatively and qualitatively, for which he was called and appointed.



CHAPTER THE ONE



It should also not be forgotten that the vessels, tools and passages of removal are contaminated with oral air, or by food or drink. This happens as follows. The air we breathe is not without the poison we are very amazed. In this regard, remember, however, that with the diversity of food and drinking, and food and drink, which cause difficulty and are not adapted to the tools of the body, even until the destruction of the tools - and this is very significant - the alchemist cannot function and digestion becomes decay and decomposition becomes decay. The stomach and other organs in the body adapt themselves according to the quality of the poison in the things that a person takes inside. Thus, a kind of foci of diseases in the affected body subsequently arises. For you, you doctors, should remember and understand that there is only one poison that generates a foci of disease, not several. For example, when you eat meat, cabbage, vegetables and spices, and decomposition begins in the stomach after their use, not all of them are the culprits; only one is the culprit. Either it is a venom of cabbage, or it's such meat, such vegetables, or such a spice. In that case, when you have unmistakable, which poison is the cause of the disease, consider it as a great mystery. You will be called a doctor, for you will know what is about help, and otherwise you will make mistakes. Let this also be one principle [by which you recognize] the mother of all diseases, of which many hundreds are found.



24 HEAD TYPE



Now our intention is to give you a little instruction on the poisons, so that you, the doctors, understand that we are considering poison. Assuming that there is poison in all the food, we have made food an incredible power that governs our body. We have further established that the alchemist is the one who separates the body useful for the good of the body with its instruments and vessels. Having completed this, the essence (essence) [from useful in food] passes into the tincture of the body, the poison from the body is removed. When events occur in this way, the person is healthy, thanks to Ens. But, in this regard, let us mention the unfavourable circumstances that may be met in this Ens, and which bring the above-mentioned to nothing, as a result of which, as indicated, the focus of the disease arises. That was enough said.



Now give us your hearing further about the type of poison. You know well what removal passages are and how many are available. To recognize the poison, it must be aware of it: Everything that passes as a substance through the sip pores is eliminated by the mercury; what passes through the nose is white gray; through the eyes, dissolved sulfur, which is decomposed in water; through the mouth, eliminated sulfur; through the mouth, eliminated sulfur; through the urin, the salt, the salt. Now, although you need to know in what form each is attested, there is no place in our Parenthesis for such a discussion. However, in De Construction Humana you can find a philosophical basis on how a doctor should know by the rules and the need, including medicines. As doctors, you should also read about the many reasons that are all mentioned in De Putrefactionibus. You will also know how the poison is included in the useful.



CHAPTER TRINATSATA



One example we want to provide to teach you to recognize, briefly, poison among the useful, and why every thing in itself is perfect, but when used by other people or animals, it becomes harmful and poisonous. Namely: In their organs, cattle have everything they need for their needs, skin from injuries (accidents), which the bare flesh can meet, the passages of removal will be used by alchemist. This is not the example that concerns us here. Rather, it is precisely that the cattle, according to its constitution, are so created to satisfy their own need and serve as food for the supply of man. Now we note that the person has to do with that cattle are poisonous. If it were created only for the benefit of man, and not for the sake of himself, he would not need horns, bones, or hooves. For they are not food, but what happens to them is not very important. Therefore, you must note that it was created completely sufficient to itself, and there is nothing in it, without which he could or would not have desired. But as soon as a person enjoys it as food, man is forced to eat also what is contrary to his own nature and is a poison that has never been poisoned for cattle at all. This poison must be eliminated by the nature of man, that is, his alchemist. Then all the other poisons, without exception, flow, as each individual type of poison is supplanted by alchemy through its appropriate removal passage. All the withdrawals will be filled. The alchemist among us is not perfect in his art, who knows as much as the alchemist who is inside man. Therefore, let everyone take as his example of how the alchemist of nature works. In the same way, so you have to go to work. If, when the poisons are separated, and still do not resemble poison, then remember that the smoke from the mines [As 2 S3 ], which, of all the poisons, becomes marvelously golden oil, and the expiry of the nostrils do not resemble their poison, although it is a very volatile poison from which all the main diseases of excess are caused, as fluxes can be known.



25 PARAGRAF THE FIRST



So let us end enough to tell you about Ens Veneni in the sense that it does only from what we eat and drink, and that it is a poison, as well as a useful thing. It should be noted that the damaged digestion begins to decompose. Then it should be taken into account, as and in what form, each poison manifests itself in its place and what diseases will be subsequently brought by the poison, and possibly death.



PARAGRAF THE SECOND



As we have not made any indication of this Ens of how the disease arises from the food poisons mentioned above, as they are classified by the passages through which they are eliminated, you are asked to give up discussion here, so that you do not too much deviate in Parenthesis and cope with it in the De Morborum Origine, where we consider the same detail for your own use, in accordance with the principle of origin. So, you will find what diseases caused by arsenic, salts, sulfur species and mercury species are, each classified in form and appearance, and how they are in the nature of their species for the cause of the disease. We wish to complete this Ens, for we would allow you to comprehend our other books.



26 ABOUT PARENTHESIS AND SHEES, RELATED LANGUAGE LANGUAGE QUESTIONS, THE THIRD BOOK



TRACTAT CASECYNO "ENS NATURALE"



CHAPTER FIRST



Since you've been doctors, perhaps, developed a strange concept in your writings on Ens Naturale, we shouldn't be concerned about it. On the contrary, we must draw your attention to Ens Naturale, the third Ens, according to our Parenthesis, from which any disease can take its origin, and every disease develops where Ens Naturale is involved in changes such as the subsequent chapters will tell.



We will find out that there is Ens Naturale. We do not use in our interpretation your native language, nor the language you have mastered in school and received your first lessons, or from Heinrichmann1. Recall the new order and simplicity of the antiquity that faded. Ens Naturale should be explained in this way. You are familiar from astronomy with the question of the influences of the guise of the verse and of all celestial bodies, and you are able to indicate the stars, planets, and the course of heaven with precision to the least iota, and you are aware of all these things. Let this be the first introduction to what we must say: Just as you recognize the heavenly vault in heaven, there is an equally identical constellation, the heavenly vault, and the rest in man. We have nothing to be ashamed, for your doctrine deals with what you call a person a microcosm. The term is rightly chosen. But you have never really understood this, and your explanations are incomprehensible and alert. Follow us in our interpretation of what we mean by microcosm. Just as the heavens are in themselves with their full vault and constellations, without excluding anything, so man is united in the constellations powerfully and separately. As the heavenly vault is the heavens independently and do not control any creation, so small is the heavenly vault, which is in man, commanded by other creations. This is only a vast, free celestial vault without any connections at all. So know two kinds of existences: heaven and earth for one, and man for the other.



CHAPTER TWO



Let us explain this to you in the following way. You are familiar with the course of the vault to the smallest detail. Further, you know the earth with all its vegetation, and you know the elements and all creations. All this, you must know, exists in man, and, understand that the heavenly vault is inside man, the heavenly vault with his great movements of the bodily planets and stars that lead to elevations, the oppositions, and the like, as you call these phenomena, as you understand them. All that astronomical theory has sought in depth and seriously in the aspects, astronomical tables, and so on, the same knowledge must be the instruction and teaching for you in relation to the bodily celestial vault. For no one among you who is deprived of astronomical knowledge can be filled with medical knowledge. Thus, what has been said, on the one hand, as referring to the vault of the heavenly vault, must, on the other hand, serve you as an indication and explanation of the corpus vague. Now, consider it also that the earth produces all kinds of fruits so that man can live on them and eat them. You must know that this is also true for man, in other words, every type of fruit that grows in the world, grass and other plants grow in man in the following sense. You know that the earth exists solely for the purpose of fruiting and for the sake of man. With the same logic, the body also exists for the same reason. Thus, from within the body grows all the food that must be used by members who belong to the body. They're pro--



1 1



According to Zudhof, this was the name of an old textbook for beginners.



27 They grow up like the fruits of the earth. Just as the latter supports a person, so the rapidly developing nutrition of the body supports the members of the body. All things, therefore, grow in man. This reasoning is designed to convey to you that the members of the body do not require any external food, but the body provides them with food from itself. In this regard, we inform you that there are only four members that the body nourishes. Others are planets, they do not need any food, like the heavenly vault. For the body is the dual, the nature of the heavenly vault and the earth. However, you must understand man as consisting of two kinds of existence, self-feeding and needy.



CHAPTER THIRD



As it was mentioned, there is something in the body that does not need food from the outside. It's the heavenly vault in the body. For just as the heavens are established in its heavenly vault without food, nor by the bodily vault of heaven. But the physical body that is equivalent to the earth is a source of food for four members. They get their food and, in addition, do not require anything outside. The reason is that there are four spirits in the body that support the body. However, in addition to this, it is good to know that the body contains something else. This is something, you know well, is that it supports the heavenly vault and the earth. What this exists is known from experience. But we do not wait for ourselves in the ability to comprehend what form, what form it has. Still, it is good to understand that a person also has chains that oblige him to take food from outside. Such food serves the physical body only as a fertilizer for the field. Such food does not produce a fruit in the physical body, it does not add seeds in it, it only supports the body and makes it juicy, as a fertilization field. In other respects, fertilizer is useless for the field. Food is good for a person, as if it were his fertilizer. For neither life, nor the mind, nor the inherent spirits, nor anything of the same category, come from food and drink. These things eat neither better nor worse in the presence of food and drink, for food is within, as fertilizer on the field. The field retains fertilizer for its own benefit and turns it into the state in which the fields are located. In this manner, nutrition affects the body according to what the body is habitual, and yet it has no effect on what is in the body. Let this introduction, therefore be sufficient to provide you with the understanding that in the subsequent chapters, in which we shall instruct that man is in the heavenly vault of his own body and on his own land, as well as in his own elements and other things of such nature as can be read.



CHAPTER FOUR



To begin with, let us consolidate our attention on the heavenly vault against which you must first turn your mind to creation and predestination. They are the beginning and the end and everything that is to happen between them. This is the matter of the heavenly vault.



The body, you will take note of, includes seven members. These seven members do not accept any food; they perhaps exist on their own, like the seven planets that feed on their own resources and no fuel others, nor are they absorbed from other celestial bodies. Explaining that Jupiter is the planet that does not require fertilizer to maintain its body. When it was created, it received sufficient security. Likewise, the liver does not need to be fertilized, for it maintains its nature without any fertilizer. However, if you object and talk about the fertilization of the liver, it seems ridiculous to us just as when we hear a German poet talking about blue flowers and mountains as if nothing had happened. But, as the process of fertilization should be understood, we must provide an alchemist, that is, to the farmer, who throws fertilizer on the field, for these seven members do not produce any fertilizer. Just as you have comprehed these things in the case of Jupiter and the liver, understand the same thing that the brain is the Moon, the heart of the Sun, the Secular of Saturn, the lungs of Mercury, the kidneys of Venus. As the celestial vaults from above have their course and aspect, the same thing takes place in them. In the case when you want



28 know the disease crisis, you have to recognize the natural cycle in the body. If you are unaware of this, you will be unable to determine the crisis of morbi naturales that comes from Ens Naturale. For there are two crises of disease and celestial crises, rather far from one another, as you are sure to observe.



CHAPTER FIVE



Since this is a proper topic for this Parenthesis, let us give you some guidance in determining the crisis. The child who is born will have his heavenly vault and seven members who are able to take over the functions of the seven planets. And thus, all that is the heavenly vault belongs to one heavenly vault. For if we speak of the heavenly vault, we mean the perfect heavenly vault, for it becomes perfect in the child, and not some empty.



This heavenly vault of the child takes upon itself at birth a predetermined aspect. This implies that when the creation is fully completed in the child, his fate is fixed at the same moment, which has an indication of how long the Ens Naturale should pass. Suppose, I suppose that birth took place at a certain hour. Then, at the same time, the creation is given an end, which, we will say, would have happened in the 30th year. In this case, the creation and its Ens have an aware ability by nature and as a part of nature, how long Ens Naturale should pass, that is, how many years. The corresponding example is this: As the hourglasses you have installed and launched begin to expire, you know at what point they will expire. Similarly, nature, in creation, is so arranged that it will be aware of how long Ens Naturale must pass and therefore how long it has worked and must govern. Therefore, Ens Naturae and Creati determine, as far as duration is concerned, all events that are innate into the bodily planets in the body, so they will all be performed during the time between birth and predetermined completion. One more example can follow. If a child is born at a certain hour and lives 10 hours according to Ens Naturale, his predetermined completion is arranged, then all bodily planets perform the same in their cycles as if the child had a hundred years of age. In addition, a centennial does not have more cycles to pass, however, it is short-term, than a child living only an hour or less. This is what we are trying to convey in the Ens Naturale Treat, especially what the birth and predetermined completion is. In addition, it should be remembered that other forces often nullify fate.



CHAPTER SIX



Now we offer further instruction. The unearthly vault of the heavens was created in its time and will remain throughout the time until there is a human race. So he began his cycle and a predetermined course, though he did not bring offspring. Therefore, all its cycles are enlarged in such a way that he may assume predetermined things as they have been fixed in relation to themselves. A person, however, experiences the same cycles in one hour in himself if his Ens Naturale is fixed for one hour. For this reason, the phases of the moon do not touch the brain; since many hundreds, no, many thousands of times the brain is renewed by the heart, while the Moon receives the light of the Sun even once. Yet the brain becomes renewed and full in its predetermined course as often as the Moon in its predetermined course. That's how God did things. Therefore, to cause a crisis and explain it astronomically with regard to Ens Naturale, is not natural. But what the body experiences during the disease through Ens Naturale, this leads to a crisis according to its cycle, not such than the sky. Therefore, in relation to Ens Naturale, Saturn has nothing to do with the spleen, nor a spleen to him. Therefore, count from the birth to the predetermined completion, and let the heavens be the heavens for their heavens. For they do not provide the child with his creation with equipment, and the child does not provide the heavens with their equipment. So, no one has anything from another about Ens, which has



29 of the relation. If there were someone who knew the predestined course of heaven, he would know the fate of man. But God alone knows what is predestined, that there is a conclusion. We would like you to pay attention to the fact that the elevations, the connections, the opposition and all that are still in this category are not material but spiritual events. They implement the cycle, they do not affect substances. For, the speed of the cycles of events in the bodily celestial vault does not allow an increase or decrease in substance. Therefore, only the spirit completes the cycles in each member, as well as the planets. The latter actually have time to grow and decrease. They are called Ens Longum, the man of Ens Breve.



CHAPTER HEALTH



The heart is the sun. Just as the Sun affects the Earth and itself, so the heart also influences the body and itself. And if it is not light, as the Sun gives, which the body needs, then it is the light of the body in which the heart is its Sun for all practical purposes. Likewise, the Moon is comparable to the brain, and the brain with the Moon is spiritual, but not as a substance. For this reason, so many thoughts come to the brain. Selezyonka completes his cycles in a similar way as Saturn, and as much time as he completes his return from birth to its predetermined completion, so many cycles make the spleen, completing from birth to death. The gallbladder is Mars, but it is incomparable in essence to Mars, since each celestial vault has its own special properties and nature in relation to its subject to which it is attributed. So the gallbladder is in its essence, what Mars is in its spirit, and spiritually repeats the cycles of Mars. The buds have their Venusian position and their elevations in the general similar Venus according to how they were both predestined. The action that Venus serves is the product of the fruit on the earth. Similarly, the effects of the kidneys that affect the human fetus, so it is not Venus that produces something in the body or exerts any influence. Only the kidneys have such power, and nothing else. Just as Venus is stimulated by getting power from Ens Magnum, so the kidneys get it from the mind (mind) of a person. Mercury is a planet like the lung, every one who dominates its own heavenly vault, and does not penetrate into others. As Mercury is useful for the earth and for all fruits, so the same management is given to the lungs to man. Jupiter is a planet of the liver, and it is completely like its action, so you should know that if there was no liver, there would be nothing good in the whole body. It is in the same manner that Jupiter acts, softening any fervor with its goodness. Both have identical cycles and the same action, each in its own heavenly vault.



CHAPTER ITS



Since we have indicated and stated about Ens Naturale how it is involved in the constellation, and for the sake of you discussed the reasons for this in De Sideribus Corporum, we must leave our arguments here. However, some of the things that we must mention here as an introduction to a number of topics that, taking into account the following chapters, will serve us well in this Parenthesis.



You must therefore know that the spiritual cycle of the bodily constellation begins from the root, that is, the foundation, to the end of the body of the body and from there to the ground, as its center, like reflection. For example, the heart spiritually pervades the whole body, as the sun scatters over all stars and Earth. Now, this spirit benefits only the body and its seven members, but does not change them. The brain goes out exclusively spiritually to the heart and again from the heart to its center, and in another way does not pass any other paths. The paths of the liver are spiritual only in the blood and nothing else, except. The cellure goes its way in the sides and intestines. The kidneys lead their way through the urinary passages and lumbar (loins) and its neighboring places. The light moves around the chest and throat. The gallbladder passes in the stomach and intestines. Now, we want you to understand that they are chasing down the way and getting into another passage, as a spleen enters the passage of the fallis (the gum (gall)).



30 If this happens, the disease is followed. The same is true with other cycles. You're the one who'll learn better by reading De Generatione Morborum. These words were sufficiently said here.



As for other stars, you must note, like this, that they also, in the body, remain within the same celestial vault as can be read in De Sideribus Corporum, and these are the stars who feed on their own reflections wandering in their cycles. The reason for this, let me tell you, must be sought in the seven lives of man, and has nothing to do with the true life in which the soul has its existence, as can be studied in Anima et Vita. All members get their lives from these seven planets, each from their own [planet], that is, the cycle that is proper to him; so you must understand.



CHAPTER NINE



According to the conclusion of the chapter immediately preceding the subject of seven lives, each member has its own planet. In light of this, you must know that those who are under the control of the liver who live on the liver; as are those under the control of the heart who live with the heart; and in this way all others. But now you need to read the elements in the body. If we show incomprehensible when presenting you a cure that may be different from what your colleges hold, we will be impartial, for we will be impartial, for we intend to teach you what elements, and how the elements are distributed in the body. For they also govern within Ens Naturale: Some diseases come from the seven planets, others from the elements; some of the qualities, others from the humors; others, again, from the aggregates (complexes), as will be explained later. However, in order to understand the elements in the body at the moment, pay attention to the cause. Fire occurs in the rotation of the seven planets, during which they accumulate the heat that is in them, outside, for all intentions and purposes. This should be understood as follows. The element fire is invisible in the body, except when you are beaten in the eyes. In this case, sparks are visible, since the place has passages open and sparks are the most vivid in the eyes, where they can be hidden least. So, just as there is no fire on the earth, until we hit it, it is hidden in the body. The water is placed in the whole body in all the veins, vessels, bones, flesh, and all members, and there is no member in the whole body except that it contains water and be surrounded by it, or permeated by it like the earth. The air is in the body due to the constant motion of the organs that produce the wind in the body. Just as the four winds of the world get their origin, so it is necessary to understand in relation to those. In addition, the land is the one where the nutrients grow and entrenched. In this manner, there are four elements in man as they exist on earth according to their pre-established end. Yet, let us not forget and take into account the fact that the Creator created a free creation of the four elements and that they are not generated by other organs, as shown in the books of De Creato Primo.



CHAPTER ETHER



In this description of the rotation of the stars, that is, the celestial vault, and subsequently the elements, as they are in the physical body and are sufficient in themselves, each in the sphere of their powers, was our goal to teach you these things with a comprehensive fullness.



In order to bring Ens Naturale more clearly, we must present a clear picture of the four temperaments, choleric, sanguine, melancholy and phlegmatic. But when we speak of them, we would first reject what they come from or are connected to celestial bodies or elements. That's not true. However, we must instruct and try to affirm you that they represent a special creation in the bodies. So there are four tastes in the body, as is in the earth: Acidity, sweetness, bitterness, and salinity. These four we interpret for your benefit herein as follows. The four tastes are perfect in



31 Every subject; but not in anyone else, as in man they are to be examined. The Cholera begins with bitterness, and all that is bitter is hot and dry, but it is connected with the fire. For the fire of the under consideration is neither hot nor dry. It is a type of fire. Acidity is melancholy, for everything that is sour is cold and dry. What is known under the name of melancholy and does not concern the earth, because the earth and melancholy are far from each other. Flegma stems from sweetness, for everything that is sweet is cold and wet, and not comparable to water. For, phlegm and water are comparable to fire and water. The sanguine inclination comes from the salty, and what is salty is hot and humid. In such a way, explore four temperaments as they arise in the body: Acidity, sweetness, bitterness and salinity. We will discuss the other chapter in another chapter. Thus, if in a person the salt is in excess due to the influence of Ens Complexionis, you can talk about it as a man of sanguine temperament. It would prevail bitterness in it, it is a choleric. Acidity makes melancholic, sweetness of phlegmatics. Thus, the four temperaments are in the body, as in the garden in which amarissa, polypod, vitriol and salnitre grows. In the same way, they can be in the body, while one of them may prevail.



CHAPTER THE ONE



Pointing to temperaments, it should be noted that, in addition, nothing should be attributed to a person as called Ens Naturale, although you may be aware of the inclination of man as when you speak of sanguine, as a joyful, about melancholic, who is sad. That's not the point. For the things you call the properties of nature we call spiritual properties. Recall that nature does not provide any of them, nor joy, nor dexterity, nor anything like that. This is only a spirit that clearly shows them; they are not derived from nature, but from the disembodied one, which is invested in the body. Therefore, the saying that they come from nature should not apply, for he was not the wise man who invented it. However, to further describe Ens Naturale, we draw your attention to the luminaire, which is equivalent to liquor vitae, as the body lives through it. Regarding this humora, it should be noted that there is a moisture in the body that impregnates the whole body. It is the life of organs. This hummo is Ens by itself, and is the force that creates ores in the ground (soil) and the body, what is good and bad in man. Knowing this, you will understand that man is in tune with many hundred virtues (virtues), and, in addition, to many hundred vices (vices). This does not happen to him because of some constellation in his body, nor because of some other heavenly vault. He gets it from the umor. An example of this may be given. The earth has a lot of ore inside, that is, a lot of utility (value); in one place it is not enough, in another considerable. In a man the same. There are many virtues (virtues) in it, because its humor has the nature of good ore. There are many vices in it, that is, because they give a lot of bad ore. These virtues have nothing to do with social customs or human habits, but with a combination of qualities (complexion) and beauty (adornment). For he who has a good combination of qualities (good complexion), he has a good ore, who has a bad combination of qualities (bad complexion), it has a bad ore. Therefore, it cannot be said that a person who is like a rose is a sanguine, or that he who looks like wax is a choleric. Or rather it should be said: Anyone who is rustling like a rose, he is a good man of the Sun. For gold is the noble color of the rose. Like this about other flowers. Our reason to describe this is that the combination of qualities (complexion) indicates the humor, from which you should take a hint of the nature of the humor. For many diseases that are outside the control of other forces (agencies) are due to the humor.



32 PARAGRAF THE FIRST



On the basis of the above instructions regarding the movements in the body, we should not forget that there are four cycles in the body: the celestial arch, elements, combinations of qualities (complexions), humors. Note in respect of these four that all diseases are within the orbit of these four and arise from them. For all diseases are divided into four genus Ens Naturale. One genus belongs to the stars, they are chronic diseases. The second genus belongs to the elements; they are acute diseases. The third genus belongs to temperaments; they are natural diseases. The fourth genus belongs to the humors; they are diseases associated with morbi tingentes. According to the four genera of disease, you should know how to determine the diseases associated with Ens Naturale.



PARAGRAF THE SECOND



We do not discuss in this Parenthesis, how all births are named and named directly, but we intend to discuss in detail this in De Morborum Origine. However, what we did in these eleven chapters about Ens Naturale should show that even though all the other Entias don't bother the body and are harmless, this Ens can deal with it. In order to get a more complete validity in these matters, read about it, in addition, in De Morbis et Proctitis, and what you can't understand, you will find there.



33 TEXT PARENTHESIS COASTAL MEETING ENS



____________________



BOOK FOUR AND FOURTH TYPE OF THINGS HAS MESSAGE INCH WITH LANGUAGE QUESTIONS



TRANSCTAT KASTELNO "ENS SPIRITUALE"



CHAPTER FIRST



Now let me explain Ens Spirituale. It is also a perfect force that can cause a whole body disease and alter it for all diseases. And although all kinds of criticism will be made in the course of our deliberations, we must turn our backs on them, for we have no intention of worrying about the objections that will be nullified at the very end. For, the objections they raise against us do not have such a nature as to be justified. However, if we have to talk about Ens Spirituale, we warn you that you give up the way you call the theological. For not all that is called the theology is holy, and neither are all blissful who preach it. Also, not everything is true that those who do not understand theology support. And although theologians describe this Ens with all their conviction, they do not call it or what constitutes the text of what we call the fourth pagan element. They deny what we say. But where there is nothing definite, we allow them to utter. The chatter comes from the mouth. But if it comes from God, we must keep our article, and recommend their writings. Yet one thing we must understand as saying that the knowledge of this Ens does not come from the Christian faith. For it is pagan. However, it is also not against the faith in which we will die. This should make you realize that you should not regard Ens as one of the spirits you will say: "They're all demons." So you would have said rashly, and your words would make no sense if you said, "The Devil does it." Note that in our Ens Spirituale there is no devil, no hands, no his hands, no complicity, as the devil is not a spirit. The spirit is not an angel either. It is a spirit that comes from our thoughts, without any matter into a living body. What comes after our death is a soul.



CHAPTER TWO



Leaving the question in the preceding chapter, let us do without multi-intellectual opinions and thoughts on theological sayings, and instruct you in something else, an indication of the understanding of the spirit. We will not mention angels and demons here at all, for they relate to philosophy whose competence does not describe this Ens. Let the mother of medicine speak here. The thought that embraces our Ens must first of all be aware of this: We affirm that thought produces all diseases without any opposition, as well as other great forces. This should be understood in this way that diseases join two subjects in which all diseases are localized and imprinted. One subject is matter, in other words, the body. In it, all illnesses are settled and are asleep until other forces intervene. The other subject is not matter; it is the spiritual part of the body. He is in the body intangible, invisible, and can, as well as the body, carry all the diseases, to have and suffer from them in his own way. Therefore, this Ens is called Spirituale, because the body does not take part in it. In this regard, we note that the three forces previously mentioned refer to the body; but the subsequent two, spiritual and divine power refer to thought (mind). In order not to forget, let us remind you that when the spirit suffers, the body also suffers. For it manifests itself in the body and yet is not a body. Let me



34 explain. All diseases include two kinds of diseases; they are material and spiritual diseases. Material diseases are those that give the features of matter the first three forces. Spiritual ones who are not given the features of matter by spiritual and divine forces. So let us consider the spiritual power now and describe it.



CHAPTER THIRD



There are two subjects as indicated. We will approve this, we assert, further that you know that there is a spirit in the body. Now think about what appointment he has. Just as the air protects the creations from suffocation, so the spirit accompanies the body. This spirit has its existence in man and is able to be recognized, tangible and tangible by other spirits. And in their mutual relations, they are connected to each other, like one body to another. I have a spirit, the other man has a spirit as well. The spirits know each other just as I and the neighbor know each other; they speak to each other, just as we do normally, but openly, without resorting to ordinary speech. This should be seen as a possibility that these two spirits may be angry with each other, injure one another, just as one person hurts the other. Such damage is inflicted on the spirit, the spirit inflicts on his body. Immediately the body suffers and becomes ill, not physically from the material Ens, but spiritually. Spiritual medicine is necessary in this case. Suppose there are two of you who are very attached to each other. The cause should not be sought in the body, nor is it generated in it, but it lies in the spirit of those who find one another. These two spirits may also become hostile to each other, or they may remain as they were. In order to understand the reason for this, know that spirits are not born of reason (reason), but only from the will (will) of one. The difference between will and reason is the following. Everything that lives by the will lives in the spirit. Everything that lives by reason lives in the contrary of spirit. For the mind does not create the spirit; only the soul is created by it. From the will of the spirit comes, and it is the spirit, whose Ens we describe, leaving the soul without attention.



CHAPTER FOUR



Regarding the origin of the spirit, you already know that children have no spirit, for they do not have the perfect will. Accordingly, those who have perfect will and fixation (fixation) generate within themselves a spirit that is necessary and which is not natural (artificial). Such a spirit is neither given nor predestined to man from the heavens. He begets it himself. Just as we produce fire from a piece of flint, so we produce this spirit by will. Just as the will bows, so will the spirit. All this you must understand who lives by the will, has the kind of spirit we write about the presented Ens, which is the corresponding subject in which all diseases create their imprint. They must, in this case, be carried over to those who generate this spirit within themselves. Having discussed, thus, as the spirit is generated, we want you not to forget that there are two worlds that are absolutely necessary: one corresponds to bodilyness, the other corresponds to the spirit. So the body and spirit are one, for the spirit is generated by the body by the will. At the same time, rest assured, however, that spirits have their own world, the same as us, in which they live and exist, as we in the flesh, and give among themselves a special mercy, envy, hatred, anger, and the like, without the involvement of the body. So, note our words that we are human beings can live among ourselves as we can, spirits do the same. It is not true that bodies should harm each other, spirits do not harm each other, nor that if the spirits harm each other, which they can do the same as our physical bodies, the latter are not amenable to action or inclined to such behavior. But if the spirits inflict damage on one another, then the body of the spirit to which the harm is inflicted must bear the burden that the spirit has taken.



CHAPTER FIFTH



It has been shown that the spirit makes the body sick; but as it happens, we must teach you further. Let us set out two methods. One of them, as has already been stated. One spirit harms another without intention, without intention, through envy, or through something.



35 more, which can develop between them, as described in more detail in De Spiritibus. We have no need to talk about it here, but it is important for the doctor to recognize this, so he will have knowledge and understanding of these issues.



Now to explain the second method that the spirit can cause the disease. First of all, it is precisely because of our thoughts and intention and will, which cooperate in the perfect manner that the perfect will is generated in us to the end, so that, ultimately, we identify ourselves with that will and we are left on this in the infliction of bodily harm to someone else. So the established and fixed will is the matrix (matrix), in which the spirit is born. Opinion is the opinion of the word, and the opinion is the mother of speech. So, where there is no opinion, there is no speech, not a word. So, this also exists in the case of the spirit. Just as the word comes out, so does the spirit come out, which has its habitable according to our will and desire, which must be exactly as we have chosen and wished it.



CHAPTER SIX



But further it should be noted that it is about the spirits, how they harm us. If I have to desire with a will that have one purpose to harm someone else, then this will is the essence of my spirit. My spirit, therefore, will, according to my will, act against the spirit I have in my sight, not against his body. To clarify this, my spirit is exclusively directed against his spirit and harms the spirit that suffers and suffers in the body. And it is in the body that these sufferings are felt, though it has no body or physically in the body; but it is the spirit that causes it. There is an open battle between the two spirits. Whoever defeated the other takes the victory. But what the enemy is inferior is because he does not have such decisive feelings against me as I hold against him. However, where the struggle is so full of hostility in the burning of the spirit, and I was defeated, in which case my opponent has more hostility to me than I have to do. Accordingly, how the symptoms of the battle of the spirits manifested, you need to know that such rivalries are accompanied by wounds and the like, and not somatic diseases. But somatic diseases are generated by the spirit in such a way that they have physiological effects according to their nature. They escalate in the body and healed there, as stated in the books De Origine Morborum.



CHAPTER HEAD



For better understanding, consider a few examples that we must satisfy your knowledge of this Ens Spirituale and conclude our discussion of this. For starters, you know the wax figures that are made because of spiritual hostility between two people. If, in this case, such fingerprints (replicas are buried and crushed by stones, the person in respect of whom they are made will be greatly exhausted in places where the stones lie, and will not recover until the imprint is destroyed. In this case, the person will also be easier. Now, if the leg is broken in this imprint, the same fracture will also happen to the person for whom it was made. In this manner and with injections, wounds and other injuries. The reason in these cases is this. You are familiar with the forces of necromancers who can try to do that through the art of necromancy, the appearance can be made from a thing that does not exist. But necromanty cannot damage the body, except when the spirit of another person is damaged by that spirit. Let the necromant prepare the tree and establish it. He who roals it will be cut. The reason is that his spirit cut through the spirit of the tree. This spirit has hands and feet like you, and where it is cut, there you will be cut. For you and your spirit are one. However, understand that this is not your body that receives the wound, although it may be felt in your body and visible. Your spirit (mind) causes this that has the shape of your limbs and your body. Make sure you don't treat your body with medication. For it would be in vain. But treat the spirit (mind) and the body will recover. For the spirit (spirit) is sick, not the body.



36 CHAPTER OF EIGHTY



Regarding the wax images, take note of this. If, in my desire (will), I am enmity against someone else, then the enmity must be recognized by the mediator, that is, the body. Thus it is possible that my spirit, without the help of my body, can pierce him with my sword or hurt him with my passion (desire). Thus it is also possible for me, by means of willpower to draw the spirit of my enemy into the image (image) and then to pervade and mourn it in the image of my heart. Although many reasons may have been listed here, there is no need for this by Ens, because philosophy explains it more thoroughly. But it should be understood that the action of the will is the most important moment in medical healing. For it is possible that a person who has a malicious temper and hates himself may eventually curse on himself. 1 For, the curse comes from the mental fixation. It is also possible that prints may be cursed of diseases such as fevers, epilepsy, apoplexy, and the like if made as above. And you should not see the doctors as a ridicule; you are unaware of the small part of what willpower is playing. For the will is the matrix of spirits such as those under the influence of reason. A similar effect also occurs in cattle and they have much easier than in humans. Because the human spirit struggles to a greater extent than the spirit of cattle. You'll find all this better explained in De Spiritibus and De Generatione Spirituum.



CHAPTER NINE



You may also know well about the characteristic, as if someone is a thief, then he must return to the place of his act, and why such a person is delayed many miles away. Know that the reason is in Ens Spirituale. Namely: If someone makes a figure resembling a man and draws it on the wall, then all the pierces, punches and punching, which are directed to the drawing, will be applied to the one whose name the picture is made, if he is a thief. This is because of the power by which the spirit of the thief is lured into the image of the other mind (mind), which compelled it into a drawing. In addition, note well that spirits struggle with each other, as people do in the physical world. Anything you want to happen to someone who's stolen from you will actually happen to him if you make a drawing and hit it. For your spirit will tell the thief that as a result he will become your subordinate, what you cause him. However, such a fate will not befall others who are good, for the spirit of the thief fears, like the thief himself, but a good man is brave. He resists and defends in the same way as the two people when they meet in battle. However, the reason why the thief should return to the place where his theft was committed is the fact that your spirit compels the spirit of the other to return to the place where the crime was done, because you wished it. But if this spirit was transferred to the object, namely, a drawing or a figure, then a person so coerced will not go there. But if there is no figurine, the environment in which the spirit is in, then must go. In this manner, the spirit forces a person to return to that place. For all that is done mentally must take place in the form of an object in which the spirit is invested, whether it be a figurine or a drawing in which your spirit projectes the spirit of the other, or the subject in which the spirit dwells, that is, the man who must do and do what it requires.



CHAPTER ETHER



As shown, do not forget, therefore, that the spirit has a culprit in its power. Such impacts are also carried out through envy and hatred. We discussed these things in detail, as we wanted you to understand how Ens Spirituale controls the body on the



1 1



Wed. Four Treatises of Theophrastus von Hohenheim called Paracelsus, Henry E. Sigerist ed. (The Johns Hopkins Press: 1941) 181.



37 so much that through her many diseases and all sorts of ailments can be crushed on a person. Therefore, you should not apply medical treatment for them, in particular effective for conventional diseases, but you should treat the spirit. It's a spirit that's sick. Also listen to the fact that many people are spiritually sick as a result of the will from the outside, carried out by figures, drawings and similar means. Even though people are unaware of the path that this is the will to them, however, is so strong that it ignites the spirit of another person and makes him sick. This is done in them through sleep, as follows: When people sleep, their dreams affect other people and carry out what your spirit brings to the spirit of another in a dream and then, without your knowledge, damages the same thing when the dream. This is caused by your word that you break out unconsciously in your sleep. For, the dreams of envious people become valid, as well as if they have encountered in reality their fists or in words, as is explained in De Somniis. For there is no dream that has not come from the spirit except the circumstances. For dreams come from spirits, as indicated.



PARAGRAPH THE FIRST



As mentioned above, and you now know that a person's hand can be damaged without touching him. Likewise, speech strikes him with the words you mean. It must be clear, that all this takes place through the environment (medium), and the power of the spirit.



PARAGRAF THE SECOND



In these matters, please note that faith will not bring anything, only the will does. To speak of faith or to influence in these things is more silly than reason. For example: Two people can't fight with faith, but only by actions. Thus, two willful spirits are not activated by faith, but by the impulsiveness of the injured persons. The two strike each other without the help of faith, almost through their strength, as explained in more detail in De Fide et Voluntate and De Vitonissis et Incantationibus.



38 TEXT PARENTHESIS BEDURY ENS



__________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________



BOOK FIVE NOT IS THE YASCHARE



TRACTAT CASINTER "ENS DEI"



CHAPTER FIRST



Having written four treatises on pagan use, as notified at the beginning of our books, we must now refrain from such pagan customs in our Parenthesis and speak in our own Christian way, composing the fifth book about Ens Dei, so that you do not accuse us of more pagans. For any Christian who writes differently than in the faith which he adheres to writes like the Gentile. Although we're going to write five books on medical practice after we're done with Parenthesis, in order to finish this book, we'd like you to know that in the fifth book we have to conclude a Christian style by looking at four initial books according to pagan concepts.



This is what we can do well without prejudice to our faith, for pagan medical practice follows nature and with it that God has been predestined to us. However, despite the fact that diseases arise from nature and in accordance with the four forces that have been discussed, we must seek their cure in faith, not in nature, as the fifth book on medical practice will demonstrate. Understanding this, let us not be reproached for what is described by the four forces, though they are pagan. For, for the same reason, however, you must be aware of the fact that the whole basis for treatment must be sought in the fifth book where proper medicine will be indicated. The other four books on medical practice we should write not for Christians, but for the unbelievers. For we refer the foundation of medicine to all the beliefs, our Turks, our Saracens, our Christians, and their Jews, as these books will be demonstrated.



CHAPTER TWO



Therefore, we address the Christians so that they carefully consider this fifth Parenthesis and come to the understanding that they must accept all their diseases, dependent on one thing and look for this thing in the following way. Any health and sickness comes from God, as you know, nothing comes from man. Human disease can be attributed to two groups: Natural and superimposed (insuffles) (inflictions). Natural diseases are derived from the first, second, third, and fourth forces. The imposition (suffering) comes from the fifth. Know that God has established the punishment, a sign brought to us by our diseases, by which we must realize that all our works are nothing, and that we are unaware and unaware of the truth. Perhaps in all we are weak and our weaknesses and knowledge are nothing. But, touching the essence of the question and solving it for us, rest assured that God gives disease and health, as well as medical practice for our diseases. However, in medical practice, everything has a certain purpose and is predetermined. This is a certain thing is time. Therefore, it must be borne in mind that all our diseases must be healed at a certain hour, and not according to our will. With this we mean that no physician will know when the time of recovery is near, for God has power. In addition, each disease is purgatory (purgatory . Therefore, no physician can heal except purgatory by God. So, the doctor is the one who works in harmony with the predetermined purgatory.



39 CHAPTER THIRD



According to the statement that every disease is purgatory, the doctor should remember and know that he does not believe that he knows the hour when health will recover, or the hour when his medicine takes effect. This is in God's hand. But if the predetermined course of events does not correspond to what you are going to do, then you will not do anything good to the patient with any medicine. However, if the hour of purpose has come, you will do the patient well. Make it a matter of serious reason that if a patient comes to you and becomes good from your medical treatment, he was sent to you by God. But if he is not well, then he is not sent to you by God. For when the hour of salvation is near, God sends the patient to the doctor, not before. Everything that precedes this is not in place. Therefore, ignorant physicians are the satanic spirits sent by God to the patient; the physician, who knows, sends those whose hour of recovery is established by God. In addition, take into account that fate is not made regressive, to be a doctor very well, be very good, if he is very skillful. The end of the purgatory must be reached. To whom God does not send a doctor for mercy and health, his health was not given by God. And then God, thereby appoints the patient as a doctor whether the doctor reflects prosperity or does not produce anything by his art, because God created medicine for disease and the doctor in addition. However, He keeps him from the patient until the appointed hour has come. Then only the course of nature and art is fulfilled, not before, until the time has come.



CHAPTER FOUR



For this reason, you doctors, you must know and understand that as Christians, you are assigned over nature and in relation to nature. And yet, the power of your art is diminished and held back by you until the appointed hour has come, and you are very diligent in your work. For the appointed hour is the hour in which you receive the results, and not before, even if the time for art was near. But as to the fact previously mentioned that God is the creator of all diseases, bear in mind that He has created what is disgusting to us, and what is beneficial. Therefore, we have our purgatory, as further taught at De Purgatorio.



Now, even though He, who created for us, would wish to take them again from us without a doctor, when the appointed hour came, and the purgatory is over, it can not be. For, remember, He does not want to do anything without man. If He does miracles, He does it in a human way and through the participation of man. If He cures miraculously, He does it with man's help. In the same manner, he does this with the doctors as well. Since there are two kinds of doctors, those who cure miracles and those who heal by means of medicine, are discernible from each other in this way: He who has faith, acts with miracles. If faith, however, is not so strong in all respects and the hour of purgatory has passed, and yet no faith is obvious, the physician works, despite the miracle that God would have had a wonderful faith. This was discussed with greater clarity in the fifth book of De Cura Deifica vel Fidelium. But to prevent the ink from drying up on our trans, taking into account this problem, follow the subsequent explanation, so you can understand better.



CHAPTER FIFTH



You should know that during the Hippocratic, Razesa, Galena, etc. It was an absolute pleasure to practice medicine. Reason: Purgatory was a small matter. But now, gradually less happiness can be found in medicine, as evil is on the rise; for this reason, there have never been so many bad doctors as it is now. The sourness is so strong that no doctor stops him. Even if these great doctors were here now, they would be wandering in the dark. Because, among other things, we have a plague. Therefore, we offer in this Tract (Tractant) Christian method so that we



40 needed a faith to recognize that all of our illnesses were superimposed (inflictions), the lessons and warnings that God can take them away from us because of our Christian faith, not pagan medicine, but through Christ. For, the patient who puts his hope in medicine is not a Christian. Only who put it in God is a Christian. Only then will he allow God to take care of how he should become healthy, whether marvelously through the saint, his own art, by means of a physician or by the old woman (old women). You, as Christians, must understand that God is the first healer (archphysician). For He is the highest, no lesser than who is the greatest and most powerful, without which nothing happens. Only the Gentiles who disbelieve, they call upon a man for help. You must, however, appeal to God. He will send you a healer, whether it be a saint or a doctor, or himself.



CHAPTER SIX



Mentioning above that God is the one who gives health and disease, we do not intend to talk about how to become healthy. For it is not necessary to include this here, as in its worthy place in the fifth book. However, we would like to instruct you about the power of Ens Dei, because all men become ill, except the course of nature, as shown in the four forces described above. In short, let us clarify the question for you as follows: You know that on earth man and all creations are under God's rule. Understand this, it must be obvious that He is the one who makes creations either happy or unhappy. In order to understand this properly, however, it should be known that there are two kinds of punishment, one in life, the other in death. The reason for them will be set out in their proper place. Punishment, which follows after life, we will not mention; but the others with whom we meet in life, we will discuss. You know that, because of the sin of one man, death was established, not according to the attitude of one who has never sinned, but by a great decree concerning those of the above concerning our interpretation of death in the Libro de Morte. Now, note further that the cause that caused death over us has lost its power over us. However, the Creator brings it to those who are not on the side of the tempter, not punishing for their sins, but as a sign that those who serve Him could be recognized. They are not subject to any physician, for God desires to honor them as those who belong to Him and to warn them against disobedience. There are others, but whom God punishes in their right faith and will. They come to the doctor because of this kind of structure.



CHAPTER HEALTH



Remember, there is no medicine against death, only against disease, and the doctor must know this thoroughly, since no the theologian can teach him this. Although diseases come from four forces that are not the cause at all, the cause must be fought against God's will. Only the time and the right time should be considered. Make sure you don't take the courage to practice your medical art, in addition to the hour of harvest given here, either by God or for cutting, as we will fully tell De Morte. But as medicine and disease are correlated, it is you, as doctors, you should understand well. Since the diseases appear by divine command, and from no other cause, as has been shown in Archidoxis, and natural medicine has also been created by divine providence, and as mentioned above, no one or no patient can become healthy except for him not to come by the hour of the harvest, which is the command of God, as Praedestinatio tells you that the doctor can be harmed so that he may have the right to be the law of the doctor. Yes, he is the servant of nature, and God is the lord of nature. It follows that the doctor will not make anyone healthy unless God prescribes him to bed. So, remember, Helleborus (frozen) causes vomiting; yes, health. What it should be useful when prescribed by any doctor, regardless of which is, however, is incorrect. The reason is that this is not given to every doctor,



41 to prescribe grass for the benefit of the patient and to have its effectiveness. For, the art of the true physician comes from God, and like this the dosage, practice and method, and the patient is sent to him, not to the patient. No matter what the city has a good doctor, who does a lot of useful, and can rightly be proud of his luck, more than the one that a bad doctor has. We are also talking about doctors among saints, whom we do not in any way exclude.



CHAPTER ITS



God created medicine and a physician, although He Himself is a physician and acts through a doctor, and nothing works without the doctor. Let us explain why this should be. Our interpretation is such that it is the mystery of God, why He does not want the patient to know that He Himself is a physician, not counting the fact that He promotes medical art and practice, so that a person can feel His help, not only in the miraculous actions performed by Himself as God, but also His creations, which, in the person of a medical specialist, provide help in a predetermined time, as we have indicated to you in the place.



Remember, however, that the causes of disease that emanate from the power of God that comes from His Ens cannot be understood which agent they arrive or how they arrive, as it takes place in the other four forces, where it is quite obvious. The next comparison is appropriate. Just as a man who has a piece of fabric makes a coat for himself, according to his own taste, so does God also do to us and so secretly that no physician can recognize that the patient (if he is ill as a result of the Ens of God) is bedriddened by the power of God or not. For He is initiating his power and his punishment so secretly into the four Entias that no one can think otherwise, apart from the fact that His Ens is in one of four. This is the reason why a series of diseases of one or the other of the four Entias cannot be cured by any force, since the [predetermined] hour of cessation, suitable time and number (number) has not been established. From here, the disease must continue until an hour of death. In this case, all diseases will stop, and such a great change will take place that no disease will be present more, changing like white in black. For as long as the disease goes on for so long, there is no death. Let this be said in this way, you can, as befit Christians, recognize the purgatory and the hour of its cessation.



PARAGRAPH THE FIRST



In accordance with our discussion of Ens Dei, you should finally not be confident in yourself and in any way in your art, though you are a master in this; for this is a pagan approach. But, in all cases, orient yourself through Ens Dei. It's Christian, and you'll be fine. For a doctor who is not a Christian does not pay attention to the will of God. This is a predestination as Archidoxis will teach you.



PARAGRAF THE SECOND



Now, while we could say about pagan physicians - whether they are Christians or unbelievers, they are all the same school - that they can also treat patients along with believers, it does not jeopardize or war against our Ens Dei for the following reason. If an event is the cessation of existence or formation, it must be fulfilled by those who are able and fit. But the difference is that the believer does not work against nature, when as a pagan does so. The pagan uses medicine, whether it be favorable or not, as if he were God. The believer uses the proper medicine; if it does not act, he leaves it for the right time and time as God can please. For, medicine is like a plough in the hands of doctors, which God does not reject. If self-love prevails, and the universal good is irrelevant, yet He still provides the devious food for the glory of His creations, and, moreover, the virtue that He has established may contemplate, as Musalog has already been mentioned and demonstrated.



42 CONCLUSION HIRES-scending PARENTHESIS THEOFRASSTA,



DINNER FINA ENTIA ENTIA



By presenting the Parenthesis we placed between Prologue and the five practice books we've finished it now. In addition, if you understand Parenthesis, you admit that there are five Entias. These five can provoke, each in its own manner, all diseases.



Now, however, the work is actually beginning, and we no longer need to turn to Parenthesis, but we will continue separately, dividing it into five books, as stated in Preface, following Conclusion. Remember for subsequent pages that you should not base your medical practice on the assumption of one origin of all diseases, but, as stated, on five different and different methods. If you are doctors who are enturged by the power of nature, and you who are the disciples in astronomy, do not acknowledge this, then this will not alarm us, nor the theological scripturities in which there is little truth, is still in essence undiscovered by you, to allow you to speak of the real causes. If you were good and proven doctors, you would not have cared for the approval of the usual pagan and Christian methods that you may have practiced, nor would you allow yourselves to be persuaded by the scientists in black and brown, who are not perfect; for they are dreamers, who bases their knowledge on fantasies, which can not be given any trust. In this regard, it should be noted that there are two methods that a person can use: Art and fantasy. Art includes all the intelligence, wisdom, and common sense, which are based on truth as coming from experience. But those who follow fantasy have no real foundation, for the accepted opinion is a repetitive arrogance and appropriate, which is widely known to you from your neighbors. A wise man must be familiar with these two methods, so that he is an artist, not someone who simply infestes paint.



43
